Missouri, session 2026, SB982.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 43.500, 43.503, 43.506, 43.509,
43.527, 43.530, 43.533, 43.650, 43.651, 527.270, 589.400,
589.401, 589.402, 589.403, 589.404, 589.405, 589.407, 589.410,
589.414, 589.415, 589.417, 632.489, 632.492, 632.495, 632.504,
and 632.520, RSMo, section 589.400 as enacted by house bill
nos. 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551, one hundred third general
assembly, second regular session, and section 589.414 as
enacted by house bill nos. 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551, one hundred
third general assembly, second regular session are repealed and
twenty-five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known
as sections 43.500, 43.503, 43.506, 43.509, 43.527, 43.530,
527.270, 589.400, 589.401, 589.403, 589.404, 589.405, 589.407,
589.410, 589.411, 589.412, 589.413, 589.414, 589.415, 589.417,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

HCS SB 982 2
632.489, 632.492, 632.495, 632.504, and 632.520, to read as
follows:
43.500. As used in sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Administration of criminal justice", performance
of any of the following activities: detection,
apprehension, detention, pretrial release, post-trial
release, prosecution, adjudication, correctional
supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or
criminal offenders. The administration of criminal justice
shall include the screening of employees or applicants
seeking employment with criminal justice agencies, criminal
identification activities, and the collection, storage, and
dissemination of criminal history information, including
fingerprint searches, photographs, and other unique
biometric identification;
(2) "Central repository", the division within the
Missouri state highway patrol responsible for compiling and
disseminating complete and accurate criminal history records
and statistics;
(3) "Committee", criminal records and justice
information advisory committee;
(4) "Comparable ordinance violation", a violation of
an ordinance having all the essential elements of a
statutory felony or a class A misdemeanor;
(5) "Criminal history record information", information
collected by criminal justice agencies on individuals
consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of
arrests, detentions, indictments, informations, or other
formal criminal charges, and any disposition arising
therefrom, sentencing, correctional supervision, and release;

HCS SB 982 3
(6) "Final disposition", the formal conclusion of a
criminal proceeding at whatever stage it occurs in the
criminal justice system;
(7) "Missouri charge code", a unique number assigned
by the office of state courts administrator to an offense
for tracking and grouping offenses. Beginning January 1,
2005, the complete charge code shall consist of digits
assigned by the office of state courts administrator, the
two-digit national crime information center modifiers and a
single digit designating attempt, accessory, or conspiracy.
The only exception to the January 1, 2005, date shall be the
courts that are not using the statewide court automation
case management pursuant to section 476.055; the effective
date will be as soon thereafter as economically feasible for
all other courts;
(8) "State offense cycle number", a unique number,
supplied by or approved by the Missouri state highway
patrol, on the state criminal fingerprint card. The offense
cycle number, OCN, is used to link the identity of a person,
through unique biometric identification, to one or many
offenses for which the person is arrested or charged. The
OCN will be used to track an offense incident from the date
of arrest to the final disposition when the offender exits
from the criminal justice system;
(9) "Unique biometric identification", automated
methods of recognizing and identifying an individual based
on a physiological characteristic. Biometric identification
methods may include but are not limited to facial
recognition, fingerprints, palm prints, hand geometry, iris
recognition, and retinal scan.
43.503. 1. For the purpose of maintaining complete
and accurate criminal history record information, all police

HCS SB 982 4
officers of this state, the clerk of each court, the
department of corrections, the sheriff of each county, the
chief law enforcement official of a city not within a county
and the prosecuting attorney of each county or the circuit
attorney of a city not within a county shall submit certain
criminal arrest, charge, and disposition information to the
central repository for filing without undue delay in the
form and manner required by sections 43.500 to [43.651]
43.600.
2. All law enforcement agencies making misdemeanor and
felony arrests as determined by section 43.506 shall furnish
without undue delay, to the central repository,
fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any other unique
biometric identification collected, charges, appropriate
charge codes, and descriptions of all persons who are
arrested for such offenses on standard fingerprint forms
supplied or approved by the highway patrol or electronically
in a format and manner approved by the highway patrol and in
compliance with the standards set by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation in its Automated Fingerprint Identification
System or its successor program. All such agencies shall
also notify the central repository of all decisions not to
refer such arrests for prosecution. An agency making such
arrests may enter into arrangements with other law
enforcement agencies for the purpose of furnishing without
undue delay such fingerprints, photograph, and if available,
any other unique biometric identification collected,
charges, appropriate charge codes, and descriptions to the
central repository upon its behalf.
3. In order for the Missouri office of prosecution
services to maintain complete and accurate statewide reports
as required by section 56.750, on or before January 1, 2028,

HCS SB 982 5
and thereafter, all police officers of this state, the
sheriff and each deputy sheriff of each county, and the
chief law enforcement official of a city not within a county
and his or her officers shall submit referrals for any
traffic violation, ordinance violation, or misdemeanor or
felony offense referred to a prosecuting or circuit attorney
in the form and manner approved by the Missouri office of
prosecution services as required by subdivision (7) of
subsection 1 of section 56.750. At a minimum, any referral
to a prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney for a felony
offense shall include a probable cause statement and an
investigative report. Any law enforcement agency that
violates this subsection shall be ineligible to receive
state or federal funds that would otherwise be paid to such
agency for law enforcement, safety, or criminal justice
purposes.
4. In instances where an individual less than
seventeen years of age and not currently certified as an
adult is taken into custody for an offense which would be a
felony if committed by an adult, the arresting officer shall
take fingerprints for the central repository. These
fingerprints shall be taken on fingerprint cards supplied by
or approved by the highway patrol or transmitted
electronically in a format and manner approved by the
highway patrol and in compliance with the standards set by
the Federal Bureau of Investigation in its Automated
Fingerprint Identification System or its successor program.
The fingerprint cards shall be so constructed that the name
of the juvenile should not be made available to the central
repository. The individual's name and the unique number
associated with the fingerprints and other pertinent
information shall be provided to the court of jurisdiction

HCS SB 982 6
by the agency taking the juvenile into custody. The
juvenile's fingerprints and other information shall be
forwarded to the central repository and the courts without
undue delay. The fingerprint information from the card
shall be captured and stored in the automated fingerprint
identification system operated by the central repository.
In the event the fingerprints are found to match other
tenprints or unsolved latent prints, the central repository
shall notify the submitting agency who shall notify the
court of jurisdiction as per local agreement. Under section
211.031, in instances where a juvenile over fifteen and one-
half years of age is alleged to have violated a state or
municipal traffic ordinance or regulation, which does not
constitute a felony, and the juvenile court does not have
jurisdiction, the juvenile shall not be fingerprinted unless
certified as an adult.
5. Upon certification of the individual as an adult,
the certifying court shall order a law enforcement agency to
immediately fingerprint and photograph the individual and
certification papers will be forwarded to the appropriate
law enforcement agency with the order for fingerprinting.
The law enforcement agency shall submit such fingerprints,
photograph, and certification papers to the central
repository within fifteen days and shall furnish the offense
cycle number associated with the fingerprints to the
prosecuting attorney or the circuit attorney of a city not
within a county and to the clerk of the court ordering the
subject fingerprinted. If the juvenile is acquitted of the
crime and is no longer certified as an adult, the
prosecuting attorney shall notify within fifteen days the
central repository of the change of status of the juvenile.
Records of a child who has been fingerprinted and

HCS SB 982 7
photographed after being taken into custody shall be closed
100 records as provided under section 610.100 if a petition has
101 not been filed within thirty days of the date that the child
102 was taken into custody; and if a petition for the child has
103 not been filed within one year of the date the child was
104 taken into custody, any records relating to the child
105 concerning the alleged offense may be expunged under the
106 procedures in sections 610.122 to 610.126.
107 6. The prosecuting attorney of each county or the
108 circuit attorney of a city not within a county or the
109 municipal prosecuting attorney shall notify the central
110 repository on standard forms supplied by the highway patrol
111 or in a manner approved by the highway patrol of his or her
112 decision to not file a criminal charge on any charge
113 referred to such prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney
114 for criminal charges. All records forwarded to the central
115 repository and the courts by prosecutors or circuit
116 attorneys as required by sections 43.500 to 43.530 shall
117 include the state offense cycle number of the offense, the
118 charge code for the offense, and the originating agency
119 identifier number of the reporting prosecutor, using such
120 numbers as assigned by the highway patrol.
121 7. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not
122 within a county or municipal court clerk shall furnish the
123 central repository, on standard forms supplied by the
124 highway patrol or in a manner approved by the highway
125 patrol, with a record of all charges filed, including all
126 those added subsequent to the filing of a criminal court
127 case, amended charges, and all final dispositions of cases
128 for which the central repository has a record of an arrest
129 or a record of fingerprints reported pursuant to sections

HCS SB 982 8
130 43.500 to 43.506. Such information shall include, for each
131 charge:
132 (1) All judgments of not guilty, acquittals on the
133 ground of mental disease or defect excluding responsibility,
134 judgments or pleas of guilty including the sentence, if any,
135 or probation, if any, pronounced by the court, nolle pros,
136 discharges, releases and dismissals in the trial court;
137 (2) Court orders filed with the clerk of the courts
138 which reverse a reported conviction or vacate or modify a
139 sentence;
140 (3) Judgments terminating or revoking a sentence to
141 probation, supervision or conditional release and any
142 resentencing after such revocation; and
143 (4) The offense cycle number of the offense, and the
144 originating agency identifier number of the sentencing
145 court, using such numbers as assigned by the highway patrol.
146 8. The clerk of the courts of each county or city not
147 within a county shall furnish, to the department of
148 corrections or department of mental health, court judgment
149 and sentence documents and the state offense cycle number
150 and the charge code of the offense which resulted in the
151 commitment or assignment of an offender to the jurisdiction
152 of the department of corrections or the department of mental
153 health if the person is committed pursuant to chapter 552.
154 This information shall be reported to the department of
155 corrections or the department of mental health at the time
156 of commitment or assignment. If the offender was already in
157 the custody of the department of corrections or the
158 department of mental health at the time of such subsequent
159 conviction, the clerk shall furnish notice of such
160 subsequent conviction to the appropriate department by
161 certified mail, return receipt requested, or in a manner and

HCS SB 982 9
162 format mutually agreed to, within fifteen days of such
163 disposition.
164 9. Information and fingerprints, photograph and if
165 available, any other unique biometric identification
166 collected, forwarded to the central repository, normally
167 obtained from a person at the time of the arrest, may be
168 obtained at any time the subject is in the criminal justice
169 system or committed to the department of mental health. A
170 law enforcement agency or the department of corrections may
171 fingerprint, photograph, and capture any other unique
172 biometric identification of the person unless collecting
173 other unique biometric identification of the person is not
174 financially feasible for the law enforcement agency, and
175 obtain the necessary information at any time the subject is
176 in custody. If at the time of any court appearance, the
177 defendant has not been fingerprinted and photographed for an
178 offense in which a fingerprint and photograph is required by
179 statute to be collected, maintained, or disseminated by the
180 central repository, the court shall order a law enforcement
181 agency or court marshal to fingerprint and photograph
182 immediately the defendant. The order for fingerprints shall
183 contain the offense, charge code, date of offense, and any
184 other information necessary to complete the fingerprint
185 card. The law enforcement agency or court marshal shall
186 submit such fingerprints, photograph, and if available, any
187 other unique biometric identification collected, to the
188 central repository without undue delay and within thirty
189 days and shall furnish the offense cycle number associated
190 with the fingerprints to the prosecuting attorney or the
191 circuit attorney of a city not within a county and to the
192 court clerk of the court ordering the subject fingerprinted.

HCS SB 982 10
193 10. The department of corrections and the department
194 of mental health shall furnish the central repository with
195 all information concerning the receipt, escape, execution,
196 death, release, pardon, parole, commutation of sentence,
197 granting of executive clemency, legal name change, or
198 discharge of an individual who has been sentenced to that
199 department's custody for any offenses which are mandated by
200 law to be collected, maintained or disseminated by the
201 central repository. All records forwarded to the central
202 repository by the department as required by sections 43.500
203 to [43.651] 43.600 shall include the offense cycle number of
204 the offense, and the originating agency identifier number of
205 the department using such numbers as assigned by the highway
206 patrol.
43.506. 1. Those offenses considered reportable for
the purposes of sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600 include
all felonies; class A misdemeanors; all violations for
driving under the influence of drugs or alcohol; any offense
that can be enhanced to a class A misdemeanor or higher for
subsequent violations; and comparable ordinance violations
consistent with the reporting standards established by the
National Crime Information Center, Federal Bureau of
Investigation, for the Federal Interstate Identification
Index System; and all cases arising under chapter 566. The
following types of offenses shall not be considered
reportable for the purposes of sections 57.403, 43.500 to
[43.651] 43.600, and 595.200 to 595.218: nonspecific
charges of suspicion or investigation, general traffic
violations and all misdemeanor violations of the state
wildlife code. All offenses considered reportable shall be
reviewed annually and noted in the Missouri charge code
manual established in section 43.512. All information

HCS SB 982 11
collected pursuant to sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600
shall be available only as set forth in section 610.120.
2. Law enforcement agencies, court clerks, prosecutors
and custody agencies may report required information by
electronic medium either directly to the central repository
or indirectly to the central repository via other criminal
justice agency computer systems in the state with the
approval of the highway patrol, based upon standards
established by the advisory committee.
3. In addition to the repository of fingerprint
records for individual offenders and applicants, the central
repository of criminal history and identification records
for the state shall maintain a repository of latent prints,
palm prints and other unique biometric identification
submitted to the repository.
43.509. The director of the department of public
safety shall, in accordance with the provisions of chapter
536, establish such rules and regulations as are necessary
to implement the provisions of sections 43.500 to [43.651]
43.600. All collection and dissemination of criminal
history information shall be in compliance with chapter 610
and applicable federal laws or regulations. Such rules
shall relate to the collection of criminal history
information from or dissemination of such information to
criminal justice, noncriminal justice, and private agencies
or citizens both in this and other states. No rule or
portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of
sections 43.500 to [43.651] 43.600 shall become effective
unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
section 536.024.
43.527. For purposes of sections 43.500 to [43.651]
43.600, all federal and nonstate of Missouri agencies and

HCS SB 982 12
persons shall pay for criminal records checks, fingerprint
searches, and any of the information as defined in
subdivision (5) of section 43.500, when such information is
not related to the administration of criminal justice.
There shall be no charge for information supplied to
criminal justice agencies for the administration of criminal
justice. For purposes of sections 43.500 to [43.651]
43.600, the administration of criminal justice is defined in
subdivision (1) of section 43.500 and shall be available
only as set forth in section 610.120.
43.530. 1. For each request requiring the payment of
a fee received by the central repository, the requesting
entity shall pay a fee of not more than nine dollars per
request for criminal history record information not based on
a fingerprint search. In each year beginning on or after
January 1, 2010, the superintendent may increase the fee
paid by requesting entities by an amount not to exceed one
dollar per year, however, under no circumstance shall the
fee paid by requesting entities exceed fifteen dollars per
request.
2. For each request requiring the payment of a fee
received by the central repository, the requesting entity
shall pay a fee of not more than twenty dollars per request
for criminal history record information based on a
fingerprint search, unless the request is required under the
provisions of subdivision (6) of section 210.481, section
210.487, or section 571.101, in which case the fee shall be
fourteen dollars.
3. A request made under subsections 1 and 2 of this
section shall be limited to check and search on one
individual. Each request shall be accompanied by a check,
warrant, voucher, money order, or electronic payment payable

HCS SB 982 13
to the state of Missouri-criminal record system or payment
shall be made in a manner approved by the highway patrol.
The highway patrol may establish procedures for receiving
requests for criminal history record information for
classification and search for fingerprints, from courts and
other entities, and for the payment of such requests. There
is hereby established by the treasurer of the state of
Missouri a fund to be entitled as the "Criminal Record
System Fund". Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, if the moneys collected and
deposited into this fund are not totally expended annually
for the purposes set forth in sections 43.500 to [43.651]
43.600, the unexpended moneys in such fund shall remain in
the fund and the balance shall be kept in the fund to
accumulate from year to year.
527.270. 1. Hereafter every person desiring to change
his or her name may present a petition to that effect,
verified by affidavit, to the circuit court in the county of
the petitioner's residence, which petition shall set forth
the petitioner's full name, the new name desired, and a
concise statement of the reason for such desired change; and
it shall be the duty of the judge of such court to order
such change to be made, and spread upon the records of the
court, in proper form, if such judge is satisfied that the
desired change would be proper and not detrimental to the
interests of any other person.
2. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section, no
person required to register under sections 589.400 to
589.425 shall change his or her name for the period of time
he or she is required to register on the registry.
589.400. 1. Unless exempt from registering under
section 589.401, sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall apply to:

HCS SB 982 14
(1) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is
hereafter adjudicated for an offense [referenced in section
589.414, unless such person is exempt from registering under
subsection 9 or 10 of this section or section 589.401] that
would classify the person as a tier I offender, tier II
offender, or tier III offender in this state;
(2) [Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or
is hereafter convicted of, been found guilty of, or pled
guilty or nolo contendere to committing, attempting to
commit, or conspiring to commit one or more of the following
offenses: kidnapping or kidnapping in the first degree when
the victim was a child and the defendant was not a parent or
guardian of the child; abuse of a child under section
568.060 when such abuse is sexual in nature; felonious
restraint or kidnapping in the second degree when the victim
was a child and the defendant is not a parent or guardian of
the child; sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a
resident of a nursing home or sexual conduct with a nursing
facility resident or vulnerable person in the first or
second degree; endangering the welfare of a child under
section 568.045 when the endangerment is sexual in nature;
genital mutilation of a female child, under section 568.065;
promoting prostitution in the first degree; promoting
prostitution in the second degree; promoting prostitution in
the third degree; sexual exploitation of a minor; promoting
child pornography in the first degree; promoting child
pornography in the second degree; possession of child
pornography; furnishing pornographic material to minors;
public display of explicit sexual material; coercing
acceptance of obscene material; promoting obscenity in the
first degree; promoting pornography for minors or obscenity
in the second degree; incest; use of a child in a sexual

HCS SB 982 15
performance; or promoting sexual performance by a child;
patronizing prostitution if the individual the person
patronizes is less than eighteen years of age;
(3)] Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been
committed to the department of mental health as a criminal
sexual psychopath;
[(4)] (3) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been
found not guilty as a result of mental disease or defect of
any offense [referenced in section 589.414] that would
classify the person as a tier I offender, tier II offender,
or tier III offender;
[(5)] (4) Any juvenile certified as an adult and
transferred to a court of general jurisdiction who has been
adjudicated for an offense [listed under section 589.414]
that would classify the juvenile as a tier I offender, tier
II offender, or tier III offender;
[(6)] (5) Any juvenile fourteen years of age or older
at the time of the offense who has been adjudicated for an
offense which is equal to or more severe than aggravated
sexual abuse under 18 U.S.C. Section 2241, which shall
include any attempt or conspiracy to commit such offense.
Juveniles registering under this subdivision shall be
assigned a tier under the provisions of section 589.414 and
eligible for removal when meeting all other qualifications
in sections 589.400 to 589.425. The tier assignment under
section 589.414 shall be only for the purposes of
registration visit frequency and removal eligibility and
shall not otherwise affect the analysis of whether
registration is required under this section;
[(7)] (6) Any person who is a resident of this state
who has, since July 1, 1979, been or is hereafter
adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of

HCS SB 982 16
Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or
military jurisdiction for an offense which, if committed in
this state, would constitute an offense [listed under
section 589.414] that would classify the person as a tier I
offender, tier II offender, or tier III offender, or has
been or is required to register in another state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or
is required to register under tribal, federal, or military
law. Persons registering under this subdivision shall be
assigned a tier under the provisions of section 589.414 and
eligible for removal when meeting all other qualifications
in sections 589.400 to 589.425. The tier assignment under
section 589.414 shall be only for the purposes of
registration visit frequency and removal eligibility and
shall not otherwise affect the analysis of whether
registration is required under this section; or
[(8)] (7) Any person who has been or is required to
register in another state, territory, the District of
Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is required to
register under tribal, federal, or military law and who
works or attends an educational institution, whether public
or private in nature, including any secondary school, trade
school, professional school, or institution of higher
education on a full-time or on a part-time basis or has a
temporary residence in Missouri. ["Part-time" in this
subdivision means for more than seven days in any twelve-
month period.] Persons registering under this subdivision
shall be assigned a tier under the provisions of section
589.414 and eligible for removal when meeting all other
qualifications in sections 589.400 to 589.425. The tier
assignment under section 589.414 shall be only for the
purposes of registration visit frequency and removal

HCS SB 982 17
eligibility and shall not otherwise affect the analysis of
100 whether registration is required under this section.
101 2. Any person or juvenile to whom sections 589.400 to
102 589.425 apply shall, within three business days of
103 adjudication, release from incarceration, [or] placement
104 upon probation, release from commitment to the division of
105 youth services, release from the department of mental
106 health, or release from other placement, register with the
107 [chief law enforcement] registration official of the county
108 or city not within a county in which such person or juvenile
109 resides unless such person has already registered in that
110 county for the same offense. [For any juvenile under
111 subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this section, within
112 three business days of adjudication or release from
113 commitment to the division of youth services, the department
114 of mental health, or other placement, such juvenile shall
115 register with the chief law enforcement official of the
116 county or city not within a county in which he or she
117 resides unless he or she has already registered in such
118 county or city not within a county for the same offense.]
119 Any person or juvenile to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425
120 apply if not currently registered in their county of
121 residence shall register with the [chief law enforcement]
122 registration official [of such county or city not within a
123 county] within three business days. The [chief law
124 enforcement] registration official shall forward a copy of
125 the registration form required by section 589.407 to a city,
126 town, village, or campus law enforcement agency located
127 within the county of the [chief law enforcement]
128 registration official.

HCS SB 982 18
129 3. [The registration requirements of sections 589.400
130 through 589.425 shall be as provided under subsection 4 of
131 this section unless:
132 (1) All offenses requiring registration are reversed,
133 vacated, or set aside;
134 (2) The registrant is no longer required to register
135 and his or her name shall be removed from the registry under
136 the provisions of section 589.414; or
137 (3) The court orders the removal or exemption of such
138 person from the registry under section 589.401.
139 4.] The registration requirements shall be as follows:
140 (1) Fifteen years if the offender is a tier I [sex]
141 offender [as provided under section 589.414];
142 (2) Twenty-five years if the offender is a tier II
143 [sex] offender [as provided under section 589.414]; or
144 (3) The life of the offender if the offender is a tier
145 III [sex] offender.
146 [5.] 4. (1) The registration period shall be reduced
147 as described in subdivision (3) of this subsection for a sex
148 offender who maintains a clean record for the periods
149 described under subdivision (2) of this subsection by:
150 (a) Not being adjudicated of any offense for which
151 imprisonment for more than one year may be imposed;
152 (b) Not being adjudicated of any sex offense;
153 (c) Successfully completing any periods of supervised
154 release, probation, or parole; and
155 (d) Successfully completing an appropriate sex
156 offender treatment program certified by a jurisdiction or
157 the attorney general, regardless of whether such program was
158 court ordered or voluntary. If records of program
159 completion are unavailable and completion of such program
160 was required as a term of probation, an order discharging

HCS SB 982 19
161 the offender from probation or other record acknowledging
162 satisfactory completion of probation shall constitute prima
163 facie evidence that the offender successfully completed the
164 necessary sex offender treatment program unless rebutted by
165 evidence to the contrary.
166 (2) In the case of a:
167 (a) Tier I [sex] offender, the period during which the
168 clean record shall be maintained is ten years;
169 (b) Tier III [sex] offender adjudicated delinquent for
170 the offense which required registration in a sex offender
171 registry under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the period
172 during which the clean record shall be maintained is twenty-
173 five years.
174 (3) In the case of a:
175 (a) Tier I [sex] offender, the reduction is five years;
176 (b) Tier III [sex] offender adjudicated delinquent,
177 the reduction is from life to that period for which the
178 clean record under paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of this
179 subsection is maintained.
180 [6.] 5. For processing an initial sex offender
181 registration, the [chief law enforcement officer of the
182 county or city not within a county] registration official
183 may charge the offender registering a fee of up to ten
184 dollars.
185 [7.] 6. For processing any change in registration
186 required pursuant to section 589.414, the [chief law
187 enforcement] registration official [of the county or city
188 not within a county] may charge the person changing their
189 registration a fee of five dollars for each change made
190 after the initial registration.
191 [8. Any person currently on the sexual offender
192 registry or who otherwise would be required to register for

HCS SB 982 20
193 being adjudicated for the offense of felonious restraint of
194 a nonsexual nature when the victim was a child and he or she
195 was the parent or guardian of the child, nonsexual child
196 abuse that was committed under section 568.060, or
197 kidnapping of a nonsexual nature when the victim was a child
198 and he or she was the parent or guardian of the child shall
199 be removed from the registry. However, such person shall
200 remain on the sexual offender registry for any other offense
201 for which he or she is required to register under sections
202 589.400 to 589.425.
203 9. The following persons shall be exempt from
204 registering as a sexual offender upon petition to the court
205 of jurisdiction under section 589.401; except that, such
206 person shall remain on the sexual offender registry for any
207 other offense for which he or she is required to register
208 under sections 589.400 to 589.425:
209 (1) Any person currently on the sexual offender
210 registry or who otherwise would be required to register for
211 a sexual offense involving:
212 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force
213 was directed toward the victim or any other individual
214 involved, if the victim was an adult, unless the adult was
215 under the custodial authority of the offender at the time of
216 the offense; or
217 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force
218 was directed toward the victim, the victim was at least
219 fourteen years of age, and the offender was not more than
220 four years older than the victim at the time of the offense;
221 or
222 (2) Any person currently required to register for the
223 following sexual offenses:

HCS SB 982 21
224 (a) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under
225 section 573.020;
226 (b) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under
227 section 573.030;
228 (c) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under
229 section 573.040;
230 (d) Public display of explicit sexual material under
231 section 573.060;
232 (e) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under
233 section 573.065;
234 (f) Trafficking for the purpose of slavery,
235 involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced labor under
236 section 566.206;
237 (g) Abusing an individual through forced labor under
238 section 566.203;
239 (h) Contributing to human trafficking through the
240 misuse of documentation under section 566.215; or
241 (i) Acting as an international marriage broker and
242 failing to provide the information and notice as required
243 under section 578.475.
244 10. Any person currently on the sexual offender
245 registry for having been adjudicated for a tier I or II
246 offense or adjudicated delinquent for a tier III offense or
247 other comparable offenses listed under section 589.414 may
248 file a petition under section 589.401.]
249 7. Any person with a primary residence outside this
250 state who has a temporary residence in this state in which
251 he or she resides for more than a part-time period shall
252 register with the registration official in the jurisdiction
253 of the temporary residence in accordance with this section
254 for the duration of such person's temporary residency.

HCS SB 982 22
255 [11.] 8. Any [nonresident worker] person who is not a
256 resident of this state and not currently registered due to
257 temporary residence under subsection 7 of this section and
258 who works, including work as a volunteer or intern, or is a
259 nonresident student shall register for the duration of such
260 person's employment, including participation as a volunteer
261 or intern, or attendance at any school of higher education,
262 whether public or private, including any secondary school,
263 trade school, professional school, or institution of higher
264 education on a full-time or part-time basis [in this state
265 unless granted relief under section 589.401. Any registered
266 offender shall provide information regarding any place in
267 which the offender is staying when away from his or her
268 residence for seven or more days, including the period of
269 time the offender is staying in such place. Any registered
270 offender from another state who has a temporary residence in
271 this state and resides more than seven days in a twelve-
272 month period shall register for the duration of such
273 person's temporary residency unless granted relief under
274 section 589.401], as long as the status requiring
275 registration remains active. Such registration shall occur
276 in the county or city not within a county where the status
277 requiring registration occurs. If more than one county or
278 city not within a county meets the requirement, priority
279 shall be in the following order:
280 (1) The county of work;
281 (2) The county of school; and
282 (3) The county of volunteering or any other required
283 status,

HCS SB 982 23
284 with registration being required at only the highest
285 priority county or city not within a county where the
286 registerable status remains.
[589.400. 1. Sections 589.400 to 589.425
shall apply to:
(1) Any person who, since July 1, 1979,
has been or is hereafter adjudicated for an
offense referenced in section 589.414, unless
such person is exempt from registering under
subsection 9 or 10 of this section or section
589.401;
(2) Any person who, since July 1, 1979,
has been or is hereafter convicted of, been
found guilty of, or pled guilty or nolo
contendere to committing, attempting to commit,
or conspiring to commit one or more of the
following offenses: kidnapping or kidnapping in
the first degree when the victim was a child and
the defendant was not a parent or guardian of
the child; abuse of a child under section
568.060 when such abuse is sexual in nature;
felonious restraint or kidnapping in the second
degree when the victim was a child and the
defendant is not a parent or guardian of the
child; sexual contact or sexual intercourse with
a resident of a nursing home or sexual conduct
with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable
person in the first or second degree;
endangering the welfare of a child under section
568.045 when the endangerment is sexual in
nature; genital mutilation of a female child,
under section 568.065; promoting prostitution in
the first degree; promoting prostitution in the
second degree; promoting prostitution in the
third degree; sexual exploitation of a minor;
promoting child pornography in the first degree
as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
promoting child sexual abuse material in the
first degree; promoting child pornography in the
second degree as it existed prior to August 28,
2026; promoting child sexual abuse material in
the second degree; possession of child

HCS SB 982 24
pornography as it existed prior to August 28,
2026; possession of child sexual abuse material;
furnishing pornographic material to minors;
public display of explicit sexual material;
coercing acceptance of obscene material;
promoting obscenity in the first degree;
promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in
the second degree; incest; use of a child in a
sexual performance; or promoting sexual
performance by a child; patronizing prostitution
if the individual the person patronizes is less
than eighteen years of age; grooming of a minor;
nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual
images; or threatening the nonconsensual
dissemination of private sexual images;
(3) Any person who, since July 1, 1979,
has been committed to the department of mental
health as a criminal sexual psychopath;
(4) Any person who, since July 1, 1979,
has been found not guilty as a result of mental
disease or defect of any offense referenced in
section 589.414;
(5) Any juvenile certified as an adult and
transferred to a court of general jurisdiction
who has been adjudicated for an offense listed
under section 589.414;
(6) Any juvenile fourteen years of age or
older at the time of the offense who has been
adjudicated for an offense which is equal to or
more severe than aggravated sexual abuse under
18 U.S.C. Section 2241, which shall include any
attempt or conspiracy to commit such offense;
(7) Any person who is a resident of this
state who has, since July 1, 1979, been or is
hereafter adjudicated in any other state,
territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
country, or under federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction for an offense which, if committed
in this state, would constitute an offense
listed under section 589.414, or has been or is
required to register in another state,
territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
country, or has been or is required to register
under tribal, federal, or military law; or

HCS SB 982 25
(8) Any person who has been or is required
to register in another state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has
been or is required to register under tribal,
federal, or military law and who works or
attends an educational institution, whether
public or private in nature, including any
secondary school, trade school, professional
school, or institution of higher education on a
full-time or on a part-time basis or has a
temporary residence in Missouri. "Part-time" in
this subdivision means for more than seven days
in any twelve-month period.
2. Any person to whom sections 589.400 to
589.425 apply shall, within three business days
of adjudication, release from incarceration, or
100 placement upon probation, register with the
101 chief law enforcement official of the county or
102 city not within a county in which such person
103 resides unless such person has already
104 registered in that county for the same offense.
105 For any juvenile under subdivision (6) of
106 subsection 1 of this section, within three
107 business days of adjudication or release from
108 commitment to the division of youth services,
109 the department of mental health, or other
110 placement, such juvenile shall register with the
111 chief law enforcement official of the county or
112 city not within a county in which he or she
113 resides unless he or she has already registered
114 in such county or city not within a county for
115 the same offense. Any person to whom sections
116 589.400 to 589.425 apply if not currently
117 registered in their county of residence shall
118 register with the chief law enforcement official
119 of such county or city not within a county
120 within three business days. The chief law
121 enforcement official shall forward a copy of the
122 registration form required by section 589.407 to
123 a city, town, village, or campus law enforcement
124 agency located within the county of the chief
125 law enforcement official.
126 3. The registration requirements of
127 sections 589.400 through 589.425 shall be as

HCS SB 982 26
128 provided under subsection 4 of this section
129 unless:
130 (1) All offenses requiring registration
131 are reversed, vacated, or set aside;
132 (2) The registrant is no longer required
133 to register and his or her name shall be removed
134 from the registry under the provisions of
135 section 589.414; or
136 (3) The court orders the removal or
137 exemption of such person from the registry under
138 section 589.401.
139 4. The registration requirements shall be
140 as follows:
141 (1) Fifteen years if the offender is a
142 tier I sex offender as provided under section
143 589.414;
144 (2) Twenty-five years if the offender is a
145 tier II sex offender as provided under section
146 589.414; or
147 (3) The life of the offender if the
148 offender is a tier III sex offender.
149 5. (1) The registration period shall be
150 reduced as described in subdivision (3) of this
151 subsection for a sex offender who maintains a
152 clean record for the periods described under
153 subdivision (2) of this subsection by:
154 (a) Not being adjudicated of any offense
155 for which imprisonment for more than one year
156 may be imposed;
157 (b) Not being adjudicated of any sex
158 offense;
159 (c) Successfully completing any periods of
160 supervised release, probation, or parole; and
161 (d) Successfully completing an appropriate
162 sex offender treatment program certified by the
163 attorney general.
164 (2) In the case of a:
165 (a) Tier I sex offender, the period during
166 which the clean record shall be maintained is
167 ten years;
168 (b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated
169 delinquent for the offense which required
170 registration in a sex offender registry under
171 sections 589.400 to 589.425, the period during

HCS SB 982 27
172 which the clean record shall be maintained is
173 twenty-five years.
174 (3) In the case of a:
175 (a) Tier I sex offender, the reduction is
176 five years;
177 (b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated
178 delinquent, the reduction is from life to that
179 period for which the clean record under
180 paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of this
181 subsection is maintained.
182 6. For processing an initial sex offender
183 registration the chief law enforcement officer
184 of the county or city not within a county may
185 charge the offender registering a fee of up to
186 ten dollars.
187 7. For processing any change in
188 registration required pursuant to section
189 589.414 the chief law enforcement official of
190 the county or city not within a county may
191 charge the person changing their registration a
192 fee of five dollars for each change made after
193 the initial registration.
194 8. Any person currently on the sexual
195 offender registry or who otherwise would be
196 required to register for being adjudicated for
197 the offense of felonious restraint of a
198 nonsexual nature when the victim was a child and
199 he or she was the parent or guardian of the
200 child, nonsexual child abuse that was committed
201 under section 568.060, or kidnapping of a
202 nonsexual nature when the victim was a child and
203 he or she was the parent or guardian of the
204 child shall be removed from the registry.
205 However, such person shall remain on the sexual
206 offender registry for any other offense for
207 which he or she is required to register under
208 sections 589.400 to 589.425.
209 9. The following persons shall be exempt
210 from registering as a sexual offender upon
211 petition to the court of jurisdiction under
212 section 589.401; except that, such person shall
213 remain on the sexual offender registry for any
214 other offense for which he or she is required to
215 register under sections 589.400 to 589.425:

HCS SB 982 28
216 (1) Any person currently on the sexual
217 offender registry or who otherwise would be
218 required to register for a sexual offense
219 involving:
220 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or
221 threat of force was directed toward the victim
222 or any other individual involved, if the victim
223 was an adult, unless the adult was under the
224 custodial authority of the offender at the time
225 of the offense; or
226 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or
227 threat of force was directed toward the victim,
228 the victim was at least fourteen years of age,
229 and the offender was not more than four years
230 older than the victim at the time of the
231 offense; or
232 (2) Any person currently required to
233 register for the following sexual offenses:
234 (a) Promoting obscenity in the first
235 degree under section 573.020;
236 (b) Promoting obscenity in the second
237 degree under section 573.030;
238 (c) Furnishing pornographic materials to
239 minors under section 573.040;
240 (d) Public display of explicit sexual
241 material under section 573.060;
242 (e) Coercing acceptance of obscene
243 material under section 573.065;
244 (f) Trafficking for the purpose of
245 slavery, involuntary servitude, peonage, or
246 forced labor under section 566.206;
247 (g) Abusing an individual through forced
248 labor under section 566.203;
249 (h) Contributing to human trafficking
250 through the misuse of documentation under
251 section 566.215; or
252 (i) Acting as an international marriage
253 broker and failing to provide the information
254 and notice as required under section 578.475.
255 10. Any person currently on the sexual
256 offender registry for having been adjudicated
257 for a tier I or II offense or adjudicated
258 delinquent for a tier III offense or other

HCS SB 982 29
259 comparable offenses listed under section 589.414
260 may file a petition under section 589.401.
261 11. Any nonresident worker, including work
262 as a volunteer or intern, or nonresident student
263 shall register for the duration of such person's
264 employment, including participation as a
265 volunteer or intern, or attendance at any school
266 of higher education whether public or private,
267 including any secondary school, trade school,
268 professional school, or institution of higher
269 education on a full-time or part-time basis in
270 this state unless granted relief under section
271 589.401. Any registered offender shall provide
272 information regarding any place in which the
273 offender is staying when away from his or her
274 residence for seven or more days, including the
275 period of time the offender is staying in such
276 place. Any registered offender from another
277 state who has a temporary residence in this
278 state and resides more than seven days in a
279 twelve-month period shall register for the
280 duration of such person's temporary residency
281 unless granted relief under section 589.401.]
589.401. 1. A person on the sexual offender registry
of this state may file a petition in the division of the
circuit court in the county or city not within a county in
which the offense requiring registration was [committed]
adjudicated to have his or her name exempted or removed from
the sexual offender registry in accordance with this section.
2. (1) A person who is required to register in this
state because of an offense that was adjudicated in another
jurisdiction shall file his or her petition for removal,
termination, or relief from registration, or the declaratory
judgment providing for removal, termination, or relief from
registration according to the laws of the state, federal,
territory, tribal, or military jurisdiction, the District of
Columbia, or foreign country in which his or her offense was
adjudicated. Upon [the grant of the petition for removal in

HCS SB 982 30
the] entry of a judgment by a court of competent
jurisdiction [where the offense was adjudicated] providing
that the person is no longer required to register as a sex
offender under the laws of the adjudicating jurisdiction,
such judgment may be registered in this state by sending the
information required under subsection 5 of this section as
well as one authenticated copy of the order granting removal
from the sexual offender registry in the jurisdiction where
the offense was adjudicated to the court in the county or
city not within a county in which the offender is required
to register. On receipt of a request for registration
removal, the registering court shall cause the order to be
filed as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of the
documents and information, regardless of their form. The
petitioner shall be responsible for costs associated with
filing the petition. Nothing in this subdivision shall be
construed to remove any requirements for a petition under
this section or to remove the requirement that a person
prove he or she is entitled to removal under Missouri law,
when applicable.
(2) A person required to register as an offender in
this state based solely on an offense adjudicated in another
jurisdiction may file a petition for removal from this
state's sexual offender registry, provided that:
(a) The offense did not require the person to register
as an offender in the adjudicating jurisdiction at the time
the offense was adjudicated; or
(b) The person never resided, worked, or attended
school in the adjudicating jurisdiction and was never
required to register in the adjudicating jurisdiction.
(3) A petition filed under subdivision (2) of this
subsection shall otherwise satisfy the requirements

HCS SB 982 31
applicable to a petition filed under subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
3. A person required to register as a tier III
offender shall not file a petition under this section unless
the requirement to register results from a juvenile
adjudication.
4. The petition shall be dismissed without prejudice
if the following time periods have not elapsed since the
date the person was required to register for his or her most
recent offense under sections 589.400 to 589.425:
(1) For a tier I offense, ten years;
(2) For a tier II offense, twenty-five years; or
(3) For a tier III offense adjudicated delinquent,
twenty-five years.
5. The petition shall be dismissed without prejudice
if it fails to include any of the following:
(1) The petitioner's:
(a) Full name, including any alias used by the
[individual] petitioner;
(b) Sex;
(c) Race;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) Last four digits of the Social Security number;
(f) Address; and
(g) Place of employment, school, or volunteer status;
(2) The offense and tier of the offense that required
the petitioner to register;
(3) The date the petitioner was adjudicated for the
offense;
(4) The date the petitioner was required to register;

HCS SB 982 32
(5) The case number and court, including the county or
city not within a county, that entered the original order
for the adjudicated sex offense;
(6) Petitioner's original fingerprints on an applicant
fingerprint card;
(7) If the petitioner was pardoned or an offense
requiring registration was reversed, vacated, or set aside,
an authenticated copy of the order; and
(8) If the petitioner is currently registered under
applicable law and has not been adjudicated for failure to
register in any jurisdiction and does not have any charges
pending for failure to register.
6. The petition shall name as respondents the Missouri
state highway patrol and the [chief law enforcement]
registration official in the county or city not within a
county in which the petition is filed.
7. All proceedings under this section shall be
governed under the Missouri supreme court rules of civil
procedure.
8. The person seeking removal or exemption from the
registry shall provide the prosecuting attorney in the
circuit court in which the petition is filed with notice of
100 the petition. The prosecuting attorney may present evidence
101 in opposition to the requested relief or may otherwise
102 demonstrate the reasons why the petition should be denied.
103 Failure of the person seeking removal or exemption from the
104 registry to notify the prosecuting attorney of the petition
105 shall result in an automatic denial of such person's
106 petition.
107 9. The Missouri state highway patrol, the prosecuting
108 attorney in the circuit court in which the petition is
109 filed, and the petitioner shall have access to all

HCS SB 982 33
110 applicable records concerning the petitioner including, but
111 not limited to, criminal history records, mental health
112 records, juvenile records, and records of the department of
113 corrections or probation and parole.
114 10. The prosecuting attorney shall make reasonable
115 efforts to notify the victim of the crime for which the
116 person was required to register of the petition and the
117 dates and times of any hearings or other proceedings in
118 connection with such petition.
119 11. The court shall not enter an order directing the
120 removal of the petitioner's name from the sexual offender
121 registry unless it finds the petitioner:
122 (1) Has not been adjudicated or does not have charges
123 pending for any additional nonsexual offense for which
124 imprisonment for more than one year may be imposed since the
125 date the offender was required to register for his or her
126 current tier level;
127 (2) Has not been adjudicated or does not have charges
128 pending for any additional sex offense that would require
129 registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 since the
130 date the offender was required to register for his or her
131 current tier level, even if the offense was punishable by
132 less than one year imprisonment;
133 (3) Has successfully completed any required periods of
134 supervised release, probation, or parole without revocation
135 since the date the offender was required to register for his
136 or her current tier level, or, in the case of lifetime
137 supervision or probation, such term has been reduced or
138 terminated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
139 (4) Has successfully completed an appropriate sex
140 offender treatment program as approved by a court of

HCS SB 982 34
141 competent jurisdiction or the Missouri department of
142 corrections; and
143 (5) Is not a current or potential threat to public
144 safety.
145 12. In order to meet the criteria required by
146 subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 11 of this section,
147 the fingerprints filed in the case shall be examined by the
148 Missouri state highway patrol. The petitioner shall be
149 responsible for all costs associated with the fingerprint-
150 based criminal history check of both state and federal files
151 under section 43.530.
152 13. If the petition is denied due to an adjudication
153 in violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 11 of
154 this section, the petitioner shall not file a new petition
155 under this section until:
156 (1) Fifteen years have passed from the date of the
157 adjudication resulting in the denial of relief if the
158 petitioner is classified as a tier I offender;
159 (2) Twenty-five years have passed from the date of
160 adjudication resulting in the denial of relief if the
161 petitioner is classified as a tier II offender; or
162 (3) Twenty-five years have passed from the date of the
163 adjudication resulting in the denial of relief if the
164 petitioner is classified as a tier III offender on the basis
165 of a juvenile adjudication.
166 14. If the petition is denied due to the petitioner
167 having charges pending in violation of subdivision (1) or
168 (2) of subsection 11 of this section, the petitioner shall
169 not file a new petition under this section until:
170 (1) The pending charges resulting in the denial of
171 relief have been finally disposed of in a manner other than
172 adjudication; or

HCS SB 982 35
173 (2) If the pending charges result in an adjudication,
174 the necessary time period has elapsed under subsection 13 of
175 this section.
176 15. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
177 subsection, if the petition is denied for reasons other than
178 those outlined in subsection 11 of this section, no
179 successive petition requesting such relief shall be filed
180 for at least five years from the date the judgment denying
181 relief is entered.
182 (2) If the denial was based on a statute or law that
183 has since been amended, repealed, or invalidated, a person
184 may file a new petition within the five-year period. In
185 addition to the requirements under subsection 5 of this
186 section, the new petition shall include the case number and
187 court of the prior petition and identify the applicable
188 change in the statute or law.
189 16. If the court finds the petitioner is entitled to
190 have his or her name removed from the sexual offender
191 registry, the court shall enter judgment directing the
192 removal of the name. A copy of the judgment shall be
193 provided to the respondents named in the petition.
194 17. Any person subject to the judgment requiring his
195 or her name to be removed from the sexual offender registry
196 is not required to register under sections 589.400 to
197 589.425 unless such person is required to register for an
198 offense that was different from that listed on the judgment
199 of removal.
200 18. The court shall not deny the petition unless the
201 petition failed to comply with the provisions of sections
202 589.400 to 589.425 or the prosecuting attorney provided
203 evidence demonstrating the petition should be denied.

HCS SB 982 36
204 19. (1) The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 of this
205 section shall not apply to persons filing for exemption
206 pursuant to this subsection.
207 (2) Except as provided in this subsection, a petition
208 for exemption shall be governed by the other requirements
209 provided in this section.
210 (3) A petition for exemption under this subsection
211 shall be the exclusive remedy for adjudicating the
212 applicability of the exemptions in this subsection.
213 (4) A person shall be ordered exempt from registration
214 if the person meets the requirements of this section and the
215 offense requiring registration is:
216 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force
217 was directed toward the victim, the victim was at least
218 fourteen years of age, and the person was not more than four
219 years older than the victim at the time of the offense,
220 unless the victim was under the custodial authority of the
221 offender at the time of the offense;
222 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force
223 was directed toward the victim or any other individual
224 involved if the victim or other individual was eighteen
225 years of age or older, unless the victim was under the
226 custodial authority of the offender at the time of the
227 offense;
228 (c) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under
229 section 573.020;
230 (d) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under
231 section 573.030;
232 (e) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under
233 section 573.040;
234 (f) Public display of explicit sexual material under
235 section 573.060; or

HCS SB 982 37
236 (g) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under
237 section 573.065.
238 (5) The person shall have the burden of proving the
239 person meets the requirements for exemption. In determining
240 whether the person meets the requirements, a court may look
241 beyond the offense of conviction and consider the underlying
242 facts and conduct of the offense when evaluating
243 noncategorical exemptions.
244 (6) If a court determines a person to be exempt, the
245 provisions of sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall not apply
246 for the purposes of the exempt offense. In the event a
247 person currently registering is found to be exempt from the
248 registration visit requirements, the person shall also be
249 removed from the sexual offender registry.
250 (7) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a person
251 from remaining or being placed on the sexual offender
252 registry for any other nonexempt offense for which the
253 person is required to register under sections 589.400 to
254 589.425.
255 (8) If a petition for exemption is filed before a
256 person is required to register under sections 589.400 to
257 589.425, the requirements of sections 589.400 to 589.425
258 shall be automatically stayed pending the outcome. In the
259 event a petition is denied, the requirements of sections
260 589.400 to 589.425 shall be in effect three business days
261 following the exhaustion of all appeal rights. Nothing in
262 this subdivision shall alter or be construed to give any
263 court authority to alter ongoing requirements for persons
264 whose initial registration requirement begins prior to the
265 filing of a petition for exemption until a final order of
266 exemption is entered.

HCS SB 982 38
267 20. The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 of this
268 section shall not apply to persons filing for removal if the
269 offense requiring registration is reversed, vacated, or set
270 aside. A petition for removal due to the offense being
271 reversed, vacated, or set aside shall be filed in accordance
272 with all other requirements of this section and shall be the
273 exclusive remedy for removal in such situations. Such
274 petition shall include a certified copy of the action
275 reversing, vacating, or setting aside the offense requiring
276 registration.
277 21. This section shall be the sole remedy for removal
278 or exemption for persons adjudicated of a registerable
279 offense. No declaratory action shall be filed for relief
280 from registration requirements, except if registration, or
281 threat thereof, is the result of an offense never requiring
282 registration. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
283 to prohibit the filing of a declaratory action solely on the
284 issue of what tier an offender should be classified under.
285 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
286 person convicted of an offense that requires him or her to
287 register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall change his
288 or her legal name for the period of time he or she is
289 required to register. To the extent the person has a prior
290 legal name that was utilized on or after the date of
291 conviction for any offense requiring registration, such name
292 shall be reported under this section as an alias.
589.403. 1. Any person who is required to register
under sections 589.400 to 589.425 and who is paroled,
discharged, or otherwise released from any correctional
facility of the department of corrections, any mental health
institution, private jail under section 221.095, or other
private facility recognized by or contracted with the

HCS SB 982 39
department of corrections or department of mental health
where such person was confined shall:
(1) If the person plans to reside in this state, be
informed by the official in charge of such correctional
facility, private jail, or mental health institution of the
person's possible duty to register pursuant to sections
589.400 to 589.425. If such person is required to register
pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425, the official in
charge of the correctional facility, private jail, or the
mental health institution shall complete the initial
registration notification at least seven days prior to
release and [forward] report the offender's initial
registration[,] notification in accordance with subsection 1
of section 589.410 within three business days of release[,]
to the Missouri state highway patrol and the [chief law
enforcement] registration official of the county or city not
within a county where the person expects to reside upon
discharge, parole, or release; or
(2) If the person does not reside or plan to reside in
Missouri, be informed by the official in charge of such
correctional facility, private jail, or mental health
institution of the person's possible duty to register under
sections 589.400 to 589.425. If such person is required to
register under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the official in
charge of the correctional facility, private jail, or [the]
mental health institution shall complete the initial
registration notification at least seven days prior to
release and [forward] report the offender's initial
registration[,] notification in accordance with subsection 1
of section 589.410 within three business days of release[,]
to the Missouri state highway patrol and the [chief law
enforcement] registration official [within] of the county or

HCS SB 982 40
city not within a county where the correctional facility,
private jail, or mental health institution is located.
2. If the offender refuses to complete and sign the
registration information as outlined in this section or
fails to register with the [chief law enforcement]
registration official within three business days as
directed, the offender commits the offense of failure to
register under section 589.425 within the jurisdiction where
the correctional facility, private jail, or mental health
institution is located.
589.404. As used in sections 589.400 to 589.425, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Adjudicated" or "adjudication", adjudication of
delinquency, a finding of guilt, plea of guilt, finding of
not guilty due to mental disease or defect, or plea of nolo
contendere to committing, attempting to commit, or
conspiring to commit. Adjudication does not require the
imposition of sentence for the purposes of sections 589.400
to 589.425. The term "adjudication" shall include by
reference all acts meeting the definition of "conviction"
under Section 111 of the Sex Offender Registration and
Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection
and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
(2) "Adjudicated delinquent", a person found to have
committed an offense that, if committed by an adult, would
be a criminal offense;
(3) "Chief law enforcement official", the sheriff's
office of each county or the police department of a city not
within a county;
(4) "Electronic mail", the transmission of information
or communication by the use of the internet, a computer, a
facsimile machine, a pager, a cellular telephone or other

HCS SB 982 41
wireless communication device, a video recorder, or other
electronic means sent to a person identified by a unique
address or address number and received by that person;
(5) "Entity", a business or organization that provides
internet service, electronic communications service, remote
computing service, online service, electronic mail service,
or electronic instant message or chat services regardless of
whether the business or organization is within or outside
this state;
(6) "Instant message", a form of real-time text
communication between two or more people. The communication
is conveyed via computers connected over a network such as
the internet, or between cell phone or wireless
communication device users, or over a cell phone or wireless
communication device network;
(7) "Offender registration", the required minimum
informational content of sex offender registries, which
shall consist of, but not be limited to, a full set of
fingerprints on a standard sex offender registration card
upon initial registration in Missouri, as well as all other
forms and in whatever manner required by the Missouri state
highway patrol upon each initial and subsequent registration;
[(5)] (8) "Online identifier", includes all of the
following: electronic mail address, instant message screen
name, user ID, cell phone number or wireless communication
device number or identifier, chat or other internet
communication name, social media profiles, IP addresses, or
other identity information specified on the registration
form by the Missouri state highway patrol;
(9) "Part-time", more than seven days in any twelve-
month period;

HCS SB 982 42
(10) "Probation officer", includes any agent of a
private entity assigned to provide probation supervision
services to an offender due to the offender's status as a
sexual offender who is required to register pursuant to
sections 589.400 to 589.425;
(11) "Registration official", the chief law
enforcement official for the county or city not within a
county in which the offender is required to register;
(12) "Residence", [any place where an offender sleeps
for seven or more consecutive or nonconsecutive days or
nights within a twelve-month period] the domicile of the
offender;
[(6)] (13) "Sex offender", any person who meets the
criteria to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 or
under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act,
Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of
2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
[(7)] (14) "Sex offender registry", a system
maintained by the Missouri state highway patrol to collect,
store, and disseminate all initial notification information,
registration information, offender status, and all other
information required under sections 589.400 to 589.425. The
sex offender registry is a distinct system from the website
maintained by the Missouri state highway patrol, which
displays a distinct set of information contained within the
sex offender registry publicly on the web in accordance with
this section;
(15) "Sex offense", any offense [which] that is listed
[under section 589.414 or comparable to those listed under
section 589.414 or otherwise] as a tier I offense, tier II
offense, or tier III offense, that is comparable to offenses
listed as a tier I offense, tier II offense, or tier III

HCS SB 982 43
offense, or that is otherwise comparable to offenses covered
under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act,
Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of
2006, P.L. 109-248, as amended;
[(8)] (16) "Sexual act", any type or degree of
genital, oral, or anal penetration;
[(9)] (17) "Sexual conduct", sexual intercourse,
deviate sexual intercourse, or sexual contact;
[(10)] (18) "Sexual contact", any touching of another
person with the genitals or any touching of the genitals or
anus of another person, or the breast of a female person, or
such touching through the clothing, or causing semen,
seminal fluid, or other ejaculate to come into contact with
another person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying
100 the sexual desire of any person or for the purpose of
101 terrorizing the victim;
102 [(11)] (19) "Sexual element", used for the purposes of
103 distinguishing if sexual contact or a sexual act was
104 committed. Authorities shall refer to information filed by
105 the prosecutor, amended information filed by the prosecutor,
106 indictment information filed by the prosecutor, or amended
107 indictment information filed by the prosecutor, the plea
108 agreement, or court documentation to determine if a sexual
109 element exists;
110 [(12)] (20) "Signature", the name of the offender
111 signed in writing or electronic form approved by the
112 Missouri state highway patrol;
113 [(13)] (21) "Student", an individual who enrolls in or
114 attends the physical location of an educational institution,
115 including a public or private secondary school, trade or
116 professional school, or an institution of higher education;

HCS SB 982 44
117 [(14)] (22) "Temporary residence", any place where a
118 person sleeps for seven or more consecutive or
119 nonconsecutive days or nights within a twelve-month period,
120 other than the person's domicile;
121 (23) "Tier I offender":
122 (a) An individual who has been adjudicated for a tier
123 I offense; or
124 (b) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any
125 other state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
126 country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
127 for an offense comparable to a tier I offense or that meets
128 the definition of a tier I offense under the Sex Offender
129 Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh
130 Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as
131 amended;
132 (24) "Tier II offender":
133 (a) An individual who has been adjudicated for a tier
134 II offense; or
135 (b) Any offender who is adjudicated for an offense
136 comparable to a tier I offense or failure to register
137 offense under section 589.425 or comparable out-of-state
138 failure to register offense and who is already required to
139 register as a tier I offender due to having been adjudicated
140 of a tier I offense on a previous occasion; or
141 (c) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any
142 other state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
143 country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
144 for an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element
145 that is comparable to a tier II offense or that meets the
146 definition of a tier II offense under the Sex Offender
147 Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh

HCS SB 982 45
148 Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as
149 amended;
150 (25) "Tier III offender":
151 (a) An individual who has been adjudicated for a tier
152 III offense;
153 (b) Any offender registered as a predatory sexual
154 offender or a persistent sexual offender, as the terms
155 "predatory sexual offender" and "persistent sexual offender"
156 are defined in section 566.125;
157 (c) Any offender who is adjudicated for an offense
158 comparable to a tier I offense or tier II offense or failure
159 to register offense under section 589.425, or other
160 comparable out-of-state failure to register offense, who has
161 been or is already required to register as a tier II
162 offender because of having been adjudicated for a tier II
163 offense, two tier I offenses, or a combination of a tier I
164 offense and a failure to register offense, on a previous
165 occasion;
166 (d) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other
167 state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
168 country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
169 for an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element
170 that is comparable to a tier III offense or that meets the
171 definition of a tier III offense under the Sex Offender
172 Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh
173 Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, P.L. 109-248, as
174 amended; or
175 (e) Any offender who is adjudicated in this state for
176 any offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element
177 requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425
178 that is not classified as a tier I offense or tier II
179 offense in this section;

HCS SB 982 46
180 (26) "Tier I offense", the following adjudicated
181 offenses:
182 (a) Kidnapping in the first degree under section
183 565.110 with sexual motivation if the victim is eighteen
184 years of age or older;
185 (b) Kidnapping in the second degree under section
186 565.120 with sexual motivation if the victim is eighteen
187 years of age or older;
188 (c) Kidnapping in the third degree under section
189 565.130 with sexual motivation if the victim is eighteen
190 years of age or older;
191 (d) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the
192 victim is less than eighteen years of age;
193 (e) Child molestation in the second degree under
194 section 566.068 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, if
195 the punishment is less than one year;
196 (f) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section
197 566.083 if it is a first offense and the punishment is less
198 than one year;
199 (g) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under
200 section 566.093;
201 (h) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under
202 section 566.095;
203 (i) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section
204 566.100 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
205 (j) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section
206 566.101 if the punishment is less than a year;
207 (k) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
208 (l) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or
209 vulnerable person in the first degree under section 566.115
210 if the punishment is less than one year;

HCS SB 982 47
211 (m) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a
212 nursing facility resident or vulnerable person;
213 (n) Sexual conduct in the course of public duty under
214 section 566.145 if the victim is eighteen years of age or
215 older;
216 (o) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation
217 under section 566.209 if the victim is eighteen years of age
218 or older;
219 (p) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under
220 section 573.020 if the victim is less than eighteen years of
221 age;
222 (q) Promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in
223 the second degree under section 573.030 if the victim is
224 less than eighteen years of age;
225 (r) Possession of child pornography under section
226 573.037 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
227 (s) Possession of child sexual abuse material under
228 section 573.037;
229 (t) Furnishing pornographic material to minors under
230 section 573.040;
231 (u) Public display of explicit sexual material under
232 section 573.060 if the victim is less than eighteen years of
233 age; or
234 (v) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under
235 section 573.065 if the victim is less than eighteen years of
236 age;
237 (27) "Tier II offense", the following adjudicated
238 offenses:
239 (a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under
240 section 566.064 if the victim is sixteen to seventeen years
241 of age;

HCS SB 982 48
242 (b) Child molestation in the third degree under
243 section 566.069 if the victim is between thirteen and
244 fourteen years of age;
245 (c) Child molestation in the fourth degree under
246 section 566.071 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years
247 of age;
248 (d) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section
249 566.083 if it is a first offense and the penalty is a term
250 of imprisonment of one year or more;
251 (e) Sexual contact with a student under section
252 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
253 (f) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section
254 566.100 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
255 (g) Sexual conduct in the course of public duty under
256 section 566.145 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years
257 of age;
258 (h) Grooming or enticement of a minor under section
259 566.151;
260 (i) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a
261 minor under section 566.153;
262 (j) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if
263 the person patronized is eighteen years of age or older;
264 (k) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under
265 section 567.050 if the victim is eighteen years of age or
266 older;
267 (l) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under
268 section 567.060 if the victim is eighteen years of age or
269 older;
270 (m) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under
271 section 567.070 if the victim is eighteen years of age or
272 older;

HCS SB 982 49
273 (n) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the
274 offense is of a sexual nature and the victim is thirteen to
275 seventeen years of age;
276 (o) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section
277 573.023;
278 (p) Promoting child pornography in the first degree
279 under section 573.025 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
280 (q) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the first
281 degree under section 573.025;
282 (r) Promoting child pornography in the second degree
283 under section 573.035 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
284 (s) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the
285 second degree under section 573.035;
286 (t) Nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual
287 images under section 573.110 if the victim is seventeen
288 years of age or under or if coercion of the victim was
289 sexual in nature; or
290 (u) Threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of
291 private sexual images under section 573.112 if the victim is
292 seventeen years of age or under or if coercion of the victim
293 was sexual in nature;
294 (28) "Tier III offense", the following adjudicated
295 offenses:
296 (a) Kidnapping in the first degree under section
297 565.110 if the victim is under eighteen years of age,
298 excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian of a nonsexual
299 nature;
300 (b) Kidnapping in the second degree under section
301 565.120 if the victim is under eighteen years of age,
302 excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian of a nonsexual
303 nature;

HCS SB 982 50
304 (c) Kidnapping in the third degree under section
305 565.130 if the victim is under eighteen years of age,
306 excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian of a nonsexual
307 nature;
308 (d) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
309 (e) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
310 (f) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
311 (g) Statutory rape in the first degree under section
312 566.032;
313 (h) Statutory rape in the second degree under section
314 566.034;
315 (i) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
316 (j) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
317 (k) Statutory sodomy in the first degree under section
318 566.062;
319 (l) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under
320 section 566.064 if the victim is under sixteen years of age;
321 (m) Child molestation in the first degree under
322 section 566.067;
323 (n) Child molestation in the second degree under
324 section 566.068;
325 (o) Child molestation in the third degree under
326 section 566.069 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
327 (p) Child molestation in the fourth degree under
328 section 566.071 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
329 (q) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section
330 566.083 if the offense is a second or subsequent offense;
331 (r) Sexual contact with a student under section
332 566.086 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
333 (s) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section
334 566.100 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;

HCS SB 982 51
335 (t) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section
336 566.101 if the penalty is a term of imprisonment of one year
337 or more;
338 (u) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or
339 vulnerable person in the first degree under section 566.115
340 if the punishment is one year or more;
341 (v) Sexual conduct in the course of public duty under
342 section 566.145 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
343 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation
344 under section 566.209 if the victim is under eighteen years
345 of age;
346 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree
347 under section 566.210;
348 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree
349 under section 566.211;
350 (z) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if
351 the offender is a persistent offender or if the person
352 patronized is less than eighteen years of age;
353 (aa) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under
354 section 567.050 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
355 (bb) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under
356 section 567.060 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
357 (cc) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under
358 section 567.070 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
359 (dd) Promoting travel for prostitution under section
360 567.085 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
361 (ee) Incest under section 568.020;
362 (ff) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first
363 degree under section 568.045 if the offense is sexual in
364 nature or if the offense involves sexual intercourse or
365 deviate sexual intercourse with a victim under eighteen
366 years of age;

HCS SB 982 52
367 (gg) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the
368 offense is of a sexual nature and the victim is under
369 thirteen years of age;
370 (hh) Genital mutilation of a female child under
371 section 568.065;
372 (ii) Use of a child in a sexual performance under
373 section 573.200; or
374 (jj) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under
375 section 573.205;
376 (29) "Vehicle", any land vehicle, watercraft, or
377 aircraft.
589.405. 1. Any person who is required to register
under sections 589.400 to 589.425 and who is released on
probation, discharged upon payment of a fine, or released
after confinement in a county jail shall, prior to such
release or discharge and at the time of adjudication, be
informed of the possible duty to register pursuant to
sections 589.400 to 589.425 by the court having jurisdiction
over the case. If such person is required to register
pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425 and is placed on
probation, the court shall make it a condition of probation
that the offender report within three business days to the
[chief law enforcement] registration official of the county
of adjudication or city not within a county of adjudication
to complete initial registration. If such offender is not
placed on probation, the court shall:
(1) If the offender resides in Missouri, complete the
initial notification of duty to register form approved by
the state judicial records committee and the Missouri state
highway patrol and forward the form within three business
days to the Missouri state highway patrol and the [chief law

HCS SB 982 53
enforcement] registration official in the county or city not
within a county in which the offender resides; or
(2) If the offender does not reside in Missouri:
(a) Order the offender to report directly to the
[chief law enforcement] registration official in the county
or city not within a county where the adjudication was heard
to register as provided in sections 589.400 to 589.425; and
(b) Complete the initial notification of duty to
register form approved by the state judicial records
committee and the Missouri state highway patrol and forward
the form within three business days to the Missouri state
highway patrol and the [chief law enforcement] registration
official in the county or city not within a county where the
offender was adjudicated.
2. If the offender resides in Missouri and refuses to
complete and sign the registration information as provided
in subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section, or if
the offender resides outside of Missouri and refuses to
directly report to the [chief law enforcement] registration
official as provided in subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of
this section, the offender commits the offense of failure to
register under section 589.425.
589.407. 1. Any registration pursuant to sections
589.400 to 589.425 shall consist of completion of an
offender registration form developed by the Missouri state
highway patrol or other format approved by the Missouri
state highway patrol. Such form shall consist of a
statement, including the signature of the offender, and
shall include, but is not limited to, the following:
(1) A statement in writing signed by the person,
giving the name, address, date of birth, biological sex, as
defined in section 191.1720, Social Security number, and

HCS SB 982 54
phone number of the person, the license plate number and
vehicle description, including the year, make, model, and
color of each vehicle owned or operated by the offender, any
online identifiers[, as defined in section 43.651,] used by
the person, the place of employment of such person,
enrollment within any institutions of higher education, the
crime which requires registration, whether the person was
sentenced as a persistent or predatory offender pursuant to
section 566.125, the date, place, and a brief description of
such crime, the date and place of the conviction or plea
regarding such crime, the age and gender of the victim at
the time of the offense and whether the person successfully
completed the Missouri sexual offender program pursuant to
section 589.040, if applicable;
(2) The fingerprints and palm prints of the person;
(3) Unless the offender's appearance has not changed
significantly, a photograph of such offender as follows:
(a) Quarterly if a tier III sex offender [under
section 589.414]. Such photograph shall be taken every
ninety days beginning in the month of the person's birth;
(b) Semiannually if a tier II sex offender. Such
photograph shall be taken in the month of the person's birth
and six months thereafter; and
(c) Yearly if a tier I sex offender. Such photograph
shall be taken in the month of the person's birth; [and]
(4) A DNA sample from the individual, if a sample has
not already been obtained; and
(5) Information regarding any temporary residence
where the offender is staying away from his or her primary
residence for seven or more days, including the period of
time the offender is staying in such place, regardless of

HCS SB 982 55
whether the temporary residence is in Missouri or any other
place.
2. The offender shall provide positive identification
and documentation to substantiate the accuracy of the
information completed on the offender registration form,
including but not limited to the following:
(1) A photocopy of a valid driver's license or
nondriver's identification card;
(2) A document verifying proof of the offender's
residency; and
(3) A photocopy of the vehicle registration for each
of the offender's vehicles.
3. The Missouri state highway patrol shall maintain
all required registration information in digitized form.
4. [Upon receipt of any changes to an offender's
registration information contained in this section, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall immediately notify all
other jurisdictions in which the offender is either
registered or required to register.
5.] The offender shall be responsible for reviewing
his or her existing registration information for accuracy at
every regular in-person appearance and, if any inaccuracies
are found, provide proof of the information in question.
5. (1) Regular in-person appearances to the
registration official following initial registration shall
be required:
(a) Annually for tier I offenders;
(b) Every six months for tier II offenders; and
(c) Every ninety days for tier III offenders.
(2) For the purposes of establishing a schedule for
registration appearances, the registration official shall
ensure that the required registration interval is followed

HCS SB 982 56
from the date of any initial registration until the month of
an offender's birth and at the appropriate interval
beginning from the month of the offender's birth thereafter.
6. The signed offender registration form shall serve
as proof that the individual understands his or her duty to
register as a sexual offender under sections 589.400 to
589.425 and a statement to this effect shall be included on
the form that the individual is required to sign at each
registration.
7. If an offender has a guardian appointed by a court
of competent jurisdiction, the guardian may sign affirming
the accuracy of the offender registration form under this
section. Nothing in this subsection shall alleviate the
requirements of the offender to appear in person, nor shall
this subsection be construed to affect any restrictions
applicable to an offender because of the offender's status
on the sexual offender registry.
8. Notwithstanding subsection 1 of section 527.270, no
person required to register under sections 589.400 to
589.425 shall change his or her name for the period of time
he or she is required to be placed on the registry.
589.410. 1. All notifications of a requirement to
register shall be reported to the sex offender registry
within three days, in a manner prescribed by the Missouri
state highway patrol.
2. The [chief law enforcement] registration official
shall [forward] enter the completed offender registration
[form to] forms and related updates into the sex offender
registry in a manner prescribed by the Missouri state
highway patrol within three days. The Missouri state
highway patrol shall [enter] ensure the information entered
into the sex offender registry is accessible through the

HCS SB 982 57
Missouri uniform law enforcement system (MULES) [where it
is] and forwarded to the National Crime Information Center
(NCIC) in accordance with applicable law. The information
shall also be available to members of the criminal justice
system, and other entities as provided by law, upon
inquiry. Certain portions of the information shall also be
published on the internet in accordance with this section.
[43.650.] 589.411. 1. The Missouri state highway
patrol shall[, subject to appropriation,] maintain a web
page on the internet which shall be open to the public and
shall include a registered sexual offender search capability.
2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and 5 of this
section, the registered sexual offender search shall make it
possible for any person using the internet to search for and
find the information specified in subsection 4 of this
section, if known, on offenders registered in this state
pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425.
3. The registered sexual offender search shall include
the capability to search for sexual offenders by name, zip
code, and by typing in an address and specifying a search
within a certain number of miles radius from that address.
4. Only the information listed in this subsection
shall be provided to the public in the registered sexual
offender search:
(1) The name and any known aliases of the offender;
(2) The date of birth and any known alias dates of
birth of the offender;
(3) A physical description of the offender;
(4) The residence, temporary, work, and school
addresses of the offender, including the street address,
city, county, state, and zip code;
(5) Any photographs of the offender;

HCS SB 982 58
(6) A physical description of the offender's vehicles,
including the year, make, model, color, and license plate
number;
(7) The nature and dates of all offenses qualifying
the offender to register, including the tier level assigned
to the offender under sections 589.400 to 589.425;
(8) The date on which the offender was released from
the department of mental health, prison, or jail, or placed
on parole, supervised release, or probation for the offenses
qualifying the offender to register;
(9) Compliance status of the offender with the
provisions of section 589.400 to 589.425; and
(10) Any online identifiers[, as defined in section
43.651,] used by the person. Such online identifiers shall
not be included in the general profile of an offender on the
web page and shall only be available to a member of the
public by a search using the specific online identifier to
determine if a match exists with a registered offender.
5. Juveniles required to register under subdivision
(5) of subsection 1 of section 589.400 shall be exempt from
public notification on the internet to include any
adjudications from another state, territory, the District of
Columbia, or foreign country or any federal, tribal, or
military jurisdiction.
6. The Missouri state highway patrol shall regularly
update the web page to remove persons who have been ordered
removed or exempt by a court in accordance with section
589.401 persons who are deceased and persons who have moved
out of the state. In the case of a person who has moved out
of the state, the entry shall remain until the Missouri
state highway patrol confirms the person has complied with

HCS SB 982 59
all registration requirements in the person's new state,
territory, or country of residence, when applicable.
7. In addition to the web page maintained by the
Missouri state highway patrol, a registration official may
maintain a web page on the internet, which shall be open to
the public and shall include a registered sexual offender
search capability. Except as provided in subsections 5 and
6 of this section, the registered sexual offender search
shall make it possible for any person using the internet to
search for and find the information specified in subsection
5 of this section, if known, on offenders registered in this
state pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425. The chief
law enforcement officer of any county or city not within a
county may also publish in any newspaper distributed in the
county or city not within a county the offender information
provided under subsection 3 of this section for any offender
residing in the county or city not within a county.
[43.651.] 589.412. [1. As used in this section, the
following terms shall mean:
(1) "Electronic mail", the transmission of information
or communication by the use of the internet, a computer, a
facsimile machine, a pager, a cellular telephone or other
wireless communication device, a video recorder, or other
electronic means sent to a person identified by a unique
address or address number and received by that person;
(2) "Entity", a business or organization that provides
internet service, electronic communications service, remote
computing service, online service, electronic mail service,
or electronic instant message or chat services whether the
business or organization is within or outside this state;
(3) "Instant message", a form of real-time text
communication between two or more people. The communication

HCS SB 982 60
is conveyed via computers connected over a network such as
the internet, or between cell phone or wireless
communication device users, or over a cell phone or wireless
communication device network;
(4) "Online identifier", includes all of the
following: electronic mail address and instant message
screen name, user ID, cell phone number or wireless
communication device number or identifier, chat or other
internet communication name, or other identity information.
2.] Subject to appropriations, the Missouri state
highway patrol shall make registry information regarding a
registered sexual offender's online identifiers available to
an entity for the purpose of allowing the entity to
prescreen users or for comparison with information held by
the entity as provided by this subsection:
(1) The information obtained by an entity from the
state sexual offender registry shall not be used for any
purpose other than for prescreening its users or comparing
the database of registered users of the entity against the
list of online identifiers of persons in the state sexual
offender registry in order to protect children from online
sexual predators. The Missouri state highway patrol shall
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the release and
use of online identifier information. Any rule or portion
of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are

HCS SB 982 61
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2008, shall be invalid and void;
(2) Any entity desiring to prescreen its users or
compare its database of registered users to the list of
online identifiers of persons in the state sexual offender
registry may apply to the Missouri state highway patrol to
access the information. An entity that complies with the
rules and regulations promulgated by the Missouri state
highway patrol regarding the release and use of the online
identifier information and pays the fee established by the
Missouri state highway patrol may screen new users or
compare its database of registered users to the list of
online identifiers of persons in the state sexual offender
registry as frequently as the Missouri state highway patrol
may allow for the purpose of identifying a registered user
associated with an online identifier contained in the state
sexual offender registry;
(3) Any entity complying with this subsection in good
faith shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability
resulting from:
(a) The entity's refusal to provide system service to
a person on the basis that the entity believed that the
person was required to register under sections 589.400 to
589.425;
(b) A person's criminal or tortious acts when the
person is required to register pursuant to sections 589.400
to 589.425, and the person complied with the requirement to
register their online identifiers under section 589.407, and
committed the criminal or tortious acts against a minor with
whom he or she had communicated on the entity's system by
using their registered online identifier; or

HCS SB 982 62
(c) Any activity for which the entity would be immune
from liability under 47 U.S.C. Section 230.
[43.533.] 589.413. 1. The Missouri state highway
patrol shall, subject to appropriation, operate a toll-free
telephone number in order to disseminate registration
information provided by [individuals] persons who are
required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425, and
receive information from persons regarding the residency of
a registered sexual offender. The information available via
the telephone number shall include only information that
offenders are required to provide under section 589.407.
When the Missouri state highway patrol provides such
information regarding a sexual offender, the patrol
personnel shall advise the person making the inquiry that
positive identification of a person believed to be a sexual
offender cannot be established unless a fingerprint
comparison is made, and that it is illegal to use such
information regarding a registered sexual offender to
facilitate the commission of a crime. The toll-free
telephone number shall be published on the Missouri state
highway patrol's sexual offender registry website maintained
under section [43.650] 589.411.
2. The Missouri state highway patrol shall promulgate
rules to effect the enforcement of this section. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule

HCS SB 982 63
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2006, shall be invalid and void.
589.414. 1. Any person required by sections 589.400
to 589.425 to register shall, within three business days,
appear in person to the [chief law enforcement officer of
the county or city not within a county] registration
official if there is a change to any of the following
information:
(1) Name;
(2) Residence;
(3) Employment, including status as a volunteer or
intern;
(4) Student status; or
(5) A termination to any of the items listed in this
subsection.
2. Any person required to register under sections
589.400 to 589.425 shall, within three business days, notify
the [chief law enforcement] registration official [of the
county or city not within a county] of any changes to the
following information:
(1) Vehicle information;
(2) [Temporary lodging information;
(3)] Temporary residence information;
[(4) Email addresses, instant messaging addresses, and
any other designations used in internet communications,
postings, or telephone communications; or
(5)] (3) Telephone or other cellular number, including
any new forms of electronic communication; or
(4) Online identifiers.
3. The [chief law enforcement] registration official
[in the county or city not within a county] shall

HCS SB 982 64
immediately forward the registration changes described under
subsections 1 and 2 of this section to the Missouri state
highway patrol within three business days in accordance with
section 589.410.
4. (1) If any person required by sections 589.400 to
589.425 to register changes such person's residence or
address to a different county or city not within a county,
the person shall appear in person and shall inform both the
[chief law enforcement] registration official with whom the
person last registered and the [chief law enforcement]
registration official of the county or city not within a
county having jurisdiction over the new residence or address
in writing within three business days of such new address
and phone number, if the phone number is also changed.
(2) If any person required by sections 589.400 to
589.425 to register changes his or her state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal,
tribal, or military jurisdiction of residence, the person
shall appear in person and shall inform both the [chief law
enforcement] registration official with whom the person was
last registered and the [chief law enforcement] registration
official of the area in the new state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal,
tribal, or military jurisdiction having jurisdiction over
the new residence or address within three business days of
such new address.
(3) Whenever a registrant changes residence, the
[chief law enforcement] registration official of the county
or city not within a county where the person was previously
registered shall inform the Missouri state highway patrol of
the change within three business days.

HCS SB 982 65
(4) When the registrant is changing the residence to a
new state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall inform the responsible
official in the new state, territory, the District of
Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or
military jurisdiction of residence within three business
days.
5. Registrants shall appear in person before the
registration official and complete all forms required for
such purposes by the United States Marshal's Service no less
than twenty-one days before travel outside of the United
States. Such information shall be forwarded to the United
States Marshal's Service, and a copy shall be provided by
the registration official to the Missouri state highway
patrol in a manner prescribed by the Missouri state highway
patrol.
6. Offenders shall be classified as a tier I offender,
tier II offender, or tier III offender in accordance with
this section. To the extent more than one tier definition
applies to an offender, the highest tier that applies shall
be the tier the offender is classified into.
7. The initial determination as to the tier of an
offender shall be made by the registration official when an
offender first appears for registration with the official.
Upon receipt of an initial offender registration from a new
registration official, the Missouri state highway patrol
shall analyze the initial tier determination for accuracy.
If the Missouri state highway patrol determines the initial
tier decision is inaccurate, the Missouri state highway
patrol shall notify the registration official, and the
Missouri state highway patrol's determination shall control

HCS SB 982 66
the tier classification. Upon receipt of an updated tiering
decision, the registration official shall notify the
offender no later than the next previously scheduled in-
person check-in for the offender. Upon notification of the
offender or failure of the offender to appear at the next
regularly scheduled in-person check, reporting requirements
aligning with the new tier determination shall be in effect.
100 8. Tier I [sexual] offenders, in addition to the
101 requirements of subsections 1 to [4] 5 of this section,
102 shall report in person [to] before the [chief law
103 enforcement] registration official annually in the month of
104 their birth to verify the information contained in their
105 statement made pursuant to section 589.407. [Tier I sexual
106 offenders include:
107 (1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the
108 offense of:
109 (a) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section
110 566.100 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
111 (b) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section
112 566.083 if it is a first offense and the punishment is less
113 than one year;
114 (c) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section
115 566.101 if the punishment is less than a year;
116 (d) Kidnapping in the second degree under section
117 565.120 with sexual motivation;
118 (e) Kidnapping in the third degree under section
119 565.130;
120 (f) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or
121 vulnerable person in the first degree under section 566.115
122 if the punishment is less than one year;
123 (g) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a
124 nursing facility resident or vulnerable person;

HCS SB 982 67
125 (h) Sexual contact with a prisoner or offender under
126 section 566.145 if the victim is eighteen years of age or
127 older;
128 (i) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
129 (j) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation
130 under section 566.209 if the victim is eighteen years of age
131 or older;
132 (k) Possession of child pornography under section
133 573.037;
134 (l) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under
135 section 566.093;
136 (m) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under
137 section 566.095;
138 (n) Child molestation in the second degree under
139 section 566.068 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, if
140 the punishment is less than one year; or
141 (o) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the
142 victim is less than eighteen years of age;
143 (2) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any
144 other state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
145 country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
146 of an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element
147 that is comparable to the tier I sexual offenses listed in
148 this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this
149 subsection, comparable to those described as tier I offenses
150 under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act,
151 Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of
152 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
153 6.] 9. Tier II [sexual] offenders, in addition to the
154 requirements of subsections 1 to [4] 5 of this section,
155 shall report semiannually in person in the month of their
156 birth and six months thereafter to the [chief law

HCS SB 982 68
157 enforcement] registration official to verify the information
158 contained in their statement made pursuant to section
159 589.407. [Tier II sexual offenders include:
160 (1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the
161 offense of:
162 (a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under
163 section 566.064 if the victim is sixteen to seventeen years
164 of age;
165 (b) Child molestation in the third degree under
166 section 566.069 if the victim is between thirteen and
167 fourteen years of age;
168 (c) Sexual contact with a student under section
169 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
170 (d) Enticement of a child under section 566.151;
171 (e) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the
172 offense is of a sexual nature and the victim is thirteen to
173 seventeen years of age;
174 (f) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section
175 573.023;
176 (g) Promoting child pornography in the first degree
177 under section 573.025;
178 (h) Promoting child pornography in the second degree
179 under section 573.035;
180 (i) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030;
181 (j) Sexual contact with a prisoner or offender under
182 section 566.145 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years
183 of age;
184 (k) Child molestation in the fourth degree under
185 section 566.071 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years
186 of age;

HCS SB 982 69
187 (l) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section
188 566.083 if it is a first offense and the penalty is a term
189 of imprisonment of more than a year; or
190 (m) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a
191 minor under section 566.153;
192 (2) Any person who is adjudicated of an offense
193 comparable to a tier I offense listed in this section or
194 failure to register offense under section 589.425 or
195 comparable out-of-state failure to register offense and who
196 is already required to register as a tier I offender due to
197 having been adjudicated of a tier I offense on a previous
198 occasion; or
199 (3) Any person who is or has been adjudicated in any
200 other state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
201 country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
202 for an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element
203 that is comparable to the tier II sexual offenses listed in
204 this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this
205 subsection, comparable to those described as tier II
206 offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and
207 Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection
208 and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
209 7.] 10. Tier III [sexual] offenders, in addition to
210 the requirements of subsections 1 to [4] 5 of this section,
211 shall report in person [to] before the [chief law
212 enforcement] registration official every ninety days to
213 verify the information contained in their statement made
214 under section 589.407. [Tier III sexual offenders include:
215 (1) Any offender registered as a predatory sexual
216 offender as defined in section 566.123 or a persistent
217 sexual offender as defined in section 566.124;

HCS SB 982 70
218 (2) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the
219 crime of:
220 (a) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
221 (b) Statutory rape in the first degree under section
222 566.032;
223 (c) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
224 (d) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first
225 degree under section 568.045 if the offense is sexual in
226 nature;
227 (e) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
228 (f) Statutory sodomy under section 566.062;
229 (g) Statutory sodomy under section 566.064 if the
230 victim is under sixteen years of age;
231 (h) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
232 (i) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section
233 566.083 if the offense is a second or subsequent offense;
234 (j) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section
235 566.100 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
236 (k) Kidnapping in the first degree under section
237 565.110 if the victim is under eighteen years of age,
238 excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian;
239 (l) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
240 (m) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or
241 vulnerable person in the first degree under section 566.115
242 if the punishment is greater than a year;
243 (n) Incest under section 568.020;
244 (o) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first
245 degree under section 568.045 with sexual intercourse or
246 deviate sexual intercourse with a victim under eighteen
247 years of age;
248 (p) Child molestation in the first degree under
249 section 566.067;

HCS SB 982 71
250 (q) Child molestation in the second degree under
251 section 566.068;
252 (r) Child molestation in the third degree under
253 section 566.069 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
254 (s) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under
255 section 567.050 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
256 (t) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under
257 section 567.060 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
258 (u) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under
259 section 567.070 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
260 (v) Promoting travel for prostitution under section
261 567.085 if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
262 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation
263 under section 566.209 if the victim is under eighteen years
264 of age;
265 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree
266 under section 566.210;
267 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree
268 under section 566.211;
269 (z) Genital mutilation of a female child under section
270 568.065;
271 (aa) Statutory rape in the second degree under section
272 566.034;
273 (bb) Child molestation in the fourth degree under
274 section 566.071 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
275 (cc) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section
276 566.101 if the penalty is a term of imprisonment of more
277 than a year;
278 (dd) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if
279 the offender is a persistent offender;

HCS SB 982 72
280 (ee) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the
281 offense is of a sexual nature and the victim is under
282 thirteen years of age;
283 (ff) Sexual contact with a prisoner or offender under
284 section 566.145 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
285 (gg) Sexual intercourse with a prisoner or offender
286 under section 566.145;
287 (hh) Sexual contact with a student under section
288 566.086 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
289 (ii) Use of a child in a sexual performance under
290 section 573.200; or
291 (jj) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under
292 section 573.205;
293 (3) Any offender who is adjudicated for a crime
294 comparable to a tier I or tier II offense listed in this
295 section or failure to register offense under section
296 589.425, or other comparable out-of-state failure to
297 register offense, who has been or is already required to
298 register as a tier II offender because of having been
299 adjudicated for a tier II offense, two tier I offenses, or
300 combination of a tier I offense and failure to register
301 offense, on a previous occasion;
302 (4) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other
303 state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
304 country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
305 for an offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element
306 that is comparable to a tier III offense listed in this
307 section or a tier III offense under the Sex Offender
308 Registration and Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh
309 Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248; or
310 (5) Any offender who is adjudicated in Missouri for
311 any offense of a sexual nature requiring registration under

HCS SB 982 73
312 sections 589.400 to 589.425 that is not classified as a tier
313 I or tier II offense in this section.
314 8.] 11. In addition to the requirements of subsections
315 1 to [7] 5 and 8 to 10 of this section, all Missouri
316 registrants who work, including as a volunteer or unpaid
317 intern, or attend any school whether public or private,
318 including any secondary school, trade school, professional
319 school, or institution of higher education, on a full-time
320 or part-time basis or have a temporary residence in this
321 state shall be required to report in person [to] before the
322 [chief law enforcement officer] registration official in the
323 area of the state where they work, including as a volunteer
324 or unpaid intern, or attend any school or training and
325 register in that state. ["Part-time" in this subsection
326 means for more than seven days in any twelve-month period.
327 9.] 12. If a person who is required to register as a
328 sexual offender under sections 589.400 to 589.425 changes or
329 obtains a new online identifier [as defined in section
330 43.651], the person shall report such information in the
331 same manner as a change of residence before using such
332 online identifier.
[589.414. 1. Any person required by
sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register shall,
within three business days, appear in person to
the chief law enforcement officer of the county
or city not within a county if there is a change
to any of the following information:
(1) Name;
(2) Residence;
(3) Employment, including status as a
volunteer or intern;
(4) Student status; or
(5) A termination to any of the items
listed in this subsection.
2. Any person required to register under
sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall, within three

HCS SB 982 74
business days, notify the chief law enforcement
official of the county or city not within a
county of any changes to the following
information:
(1) Vehicle information;
(2) Temporary lodging information;
(3) Temporary residence information;
(4) Email addresses, instant messaging
addresses, and any other designations used in
internet communications, postings, or telephone
communications; or
(5) Telephone or other cellular number,
including any new forms of electronic
communication.
3. The chief law enforcement official in
the county or city not within a county shall
immediately forward the registration changes
described under subsections 1 and 2 of this
section to the Missouri state highway patrol
within three business days.
4. If any person required by sections
589.400 to 589.425 to register changes such
person's residence or address to a different
county or city not within a county, the person
shall appear in person and shall inform both the
chief law enforcement official with whom the
person last registered and the chief law
enforcement official of the county or city not
within a county having jurisdiction over the new
residence or address in writing within three
business days of such new address and phone
number, if the phone number is also changed. If
any person required by sections 589.400 to
589.425 to register changes his or her state,
territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
country, or federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction of residence, the person shall
appear in person and shall inform both the chief
law enforcement official with whom the person
was last registered and the chief law
enforcement official of the area in the new
state, territory, the District of Columbia, or
foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction having jurisdiction over the new

HCS SB 982 75
residence or address within three business days
of such new address. Whenever a registrant
changes residence, the chief law enforcement
official of the county or city not within a
county where the person was previously
registered shall inform the Missouri state
highway patrol of the change within three
business days. When the registrant is changing
the residence to a new state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or
federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall inform the
responsible official in the new state,
territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
country, or federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction of residence within three business
days.
5. Tier I sexual offenders, in addition to
the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of this
section, shall report in person to the chief law
enforcement official annually in the month of
their birth to verify the information contained
in their statement made pursuant to section
589.407. Tier I sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated
for the offense of:
(a) Sexual abuse in the first degree under
section 566.100 if the victim is eighteen years
of age or older;
(b) Sexual misconduct involving a child
under section 566.083 if it is a first offense
and the punishment is less than one year;
(c) Sexual abuse in the second degree
under section 566.101 if the punishment is less
than a year;
(d) Kidnapping in the second degree under
section 565.120 with sexual motivation;
(e) Kidnapping in the third degree under
section 565.130;
(f) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility
100 resident or vulnerable person in the first
101 degree under section 566.115 if the punishment
102 is less than one year;

HCS SB 982 76
103 (g) Sexual conduct under section 566.116
104 with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable
105 person;
106 (h) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or
107 offender] conduct in the course of public duty
108 under section 566.145 if the victim is eighteen
109 years of age or older;
110 (i) Sex with an animal under section
111 566.111;
112 (j) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual
113 exploitation under section 566.209 if the victim
114 is eighteen years of age or older;
115 (k) Possession of child pornography under
116 section 573.037 as it existed prior to August
117 28, 2026;
118 (l) Possession of child sexual abuse
119 material under section 573.037;
120 (m) Sexual misconduct in the first degree
121 under section 566.093;
122 [(m)] (n) Sexual misconduct in the second
123 degree under section 566.095;
124 [(n)] (o) Child molestation in the second
125 degree under section 566.068 as it existed prior
126 to January 1, 2017, if the punishment is less
127 than one year; [or
128 (o)] (p) Invasion of privacy under section
129 565.252 if the victim is less than eighteen
130 years of age; or
131 (q) Grooming of a minor under section
132 566.152;
133 (2) Any offender who is or has been
134 adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
135 District of Columbia, or foreign country, or
136 under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
137 of an offense of a sexual nature or with a
138 sexual element that is comparable to the tier I
139 sexual offenses listed in this subsection or, if
140 not comparable to those in this subsection,
141 comparable to those described as tier I offenses
142 under the Sex Offender Registration and
143 Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh
144 Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L.
145 109-248.

HCS SB 982 77
146 6. Tier II sexual offenders, in addition
147 to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of
148 this section, shall report semiannually in
149 person in the month of their birth and six
150 months thereafter to the chief law enforcement
151 official to verify the information contained in
152 their statement made pursuant to section
153 589.407. Tier II sexual offenders include:
154 (1) Any offender who has been adjudicated
155 for the offense of:
156 (a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree
157 under section 566.064 if the victim is sixteen
158 to seventeen years of age;
159 (b) Child molestation in the third degree
160 under section 566.069 if the victim is between
161 thirteen and fourteen years of age;
162 (c) Sexual contact with a student under
163 section 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to
164 seventeen years of age;
165 (d) Enticement of a child under section
166 566.151;
167 (e) Abuse of a child under section 568.060
168 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
169 victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
170 (f) Sexual exploitation of a minor under
171 section 573.023;
172 (g) Promoting child pornography in the
173 first degree under section 573.025 as it existed
174 prior to August 28, 2026;
175 (h) Promoting child sexual abuse material
176 in the first degree under section 573.025;
177 (i) Promoting child pornography in the
178 second degree under section 573.035 as it
179 existed prior to August 28, 2026;
180 (j) Promoting child sexual abuse material
181 in the second degree under section 573.035;
182 [(i)] (k) Patronizing prostitution under
183 section 567.030;
184 [(j)] (l) Sexual [contact with a prisoner
185 or offender] conduct in the course of public
186 duty under section 566.145 if the victim is
187 thirteen to seventeen years of age;

HCS SB 982 78
188 [(k)] (m) Child molestation in the fourth
189 degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
190 thirteen to seventeen years of age;
191 [(l)] (n) Sexual misconduct involving a
192 child under section 566.083 if it is a first
193 offense and the penalty is a term of
194 imprisonment of more than a year; [or
195 (m)] (o) Age misrepresentation with intent
196 to solicit a minor under section 566.153;
197 (p) Nonconsensual dissemination of private
198 sexual images under section 573.110 if the
199 victim is seventeen years of age or under or if
200 coercion of the victim was sexual in nature; or
201 (q) Threatening the nonconsensual
202 dissemination of private sexual images under
203 section 573.112 if the victim is seventeen years
204 of age or under or if coercion of the victim was
205 sexual in nature;
206 (2) Any person who is adjudicated of an
207 offense comparable to a tier I offense listed in
208 this section or failure to register offense
209 under section 589.425 or comparable out-of-state
210 failure to register offense and who is already
211 required to register as a tier I offender due to
212 having been adjudicated of a tier I offense on a
213 previous occasion; or
214 (3) Any person who is or has been
215 adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
216 District of Columbia, or foreign country, or
217 under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction
218 for an offense of a sexual nature or with a
219 sexual element that is comparable to the tier II
220 sexual offenses listed in this subsection or, if
221 not comparable to those in this subsection,
222 comparable to those described as tier II
223 offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and
224 Notification Act, Title I of the Adam Walsh
225 Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L.
226 109-248.
227 7. Tier III sexual offenders, in addition
228 to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of
229 this section, shall report in person to the
230 chief law enforcement official every ninety days
231 to verify the information contained in their

HCS SB 982 79
232 statement made under section 589.407. Tier III
233 sexual offenders include:
234 (1) Any offender registered as a predatory
235 [sexual offender as defined in section 566.123
236 or a] or persistent sexual offender as defined
237 in section [566.124] 566.125;
238 (2) Any offender who has been adjudicated
239 for the crime of:
240 (a) Rape in the first degree under section
241 566.030;
242 (b) Statutory rape in the first degree
243 under section 566.032;
244 (c) Rape in the second degree under
245 section 566.031;
246 (d) Endangering the welfare of a child in
247 the first degree under section 568.045 if the
248 offense is sexual in nature;
249 (e) Sodomy in the first degree under
250 section 566.060;
251 (f) Statutory sodomy under section 566.062;
252 (g) Statutory sodomy under section 566.064
253 if the victim is under sixteen years of age;
254 (h) Sodomy in the second degree under
255 section 566.061;
256 (i) Sexual misconduct involving a child
257 under section 566.083 if the offense is a second
258 or subsequent offense;
259 (j) Sexual abuse in the first degree under
260 section 566.100 if the victim is under thirteen
261 years of age;
262 (k) Kidnapping in the first degree under
263 section 565.110 if the victim is under eighteen
264 years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent
265 or guardian;
266 (l) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
267 (m) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility
268 resident or vulnerable person in the first
269 degree under section 566.115 if the punishment
270 is greater than a year;
271 (n) Incest under section 568.020;
272 (o) Endangering the welfare of a child in
273 the first degree under section 568.045 with
274 sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse
275 with a victim under eighteen years of age;

HCS SB 982 80
276 (p) Child molestation in the first degree
277 under section 566.067;
278 (q) Child molestation in the second degree
279 under section 566.068;
280 (r) Child molestation in the third degree
281 under section 566.069 if the victim is under
282 thirteen years of age;
283 (s) Promoting prostitution in the first
284 degree under section 567.050 if the victim is
285 under eighteen years of age;
286 (t) Promoting prostitution in the second
287 degree under section 567.060 if the victim is
288 under eighteen years of age;
289 (u) Promoting prostitution in the third
290 degree under section 567.070 if the victim is
291 under eighteen years of age;
292 (v) Promoting travel for prostitution
293 under section 567.085 if the victim is under
294 eighteen years of age;
295 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual
296 exploitation under section 566.209 if the victim
297 is under eighteen years of age;
298 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the
299 first degree under section 566.210;
300 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the
301 second degree under section 566.211;
302 (z) Genital mutilation of a female child
303 under section 568.065;
304 (aa) Statutory rape in the second degree
305 under section 566.034;
306 (bb) Child molestation in the fourth
307 degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
308 under thirteen years of age;
309 (cc) Sexual abuse in the second degree
310 under section 566.101 if the penalty is a term
311 of imprisonment of more than a year;
312 (dd) Patronizing prostitution under
313 section 567.030 if the offender is a persistent
314 offender;
315 (ee) Abuse of a child under section
316 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and
317 the victim is under thirteen years of age;
318 (ff) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or
319 offender] conduct in the course of public duty

HCS SB 982 81
320 under section 566.145 if the victim is under
321 thirteen years of age;
322 (gg) [Sexual intercourse with a prisoner
323 or offender under section 566.145;
324 (hh)] Sexual contact with a student under
325 section 566.086 if the victim is under thirteen
326 years of age;
327 [(ii)] (hh) Use of a child in a sexual
328 performance under section 573.200; or
329 [(jj)] (ii) Promoting a sexual performance
330 by a child under section 573.205;
331 (3) Any offender who is adjudicated for a
332 crime comparable to a tier I or tier II offense
333 listed in this section or failure to register
334 offense under section 589.425, or other
335 comparable out-of-state failure to register
336 offense, who has been or is already required to
337 register as a tier II offender because of having
338 been adjudicated for a tier II offense, two tier
339 I offenses, or combination of a tier I offense
340 and failure to register offense, on a previous
341 occasion;
342 (4) Any offender who is adjudicated in any
343 other state, territory, the District of
344 Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal,
345 tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense
346 of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that
347 is comparable to a tier III offense listed in
348 this section or a tier III offense under the Sex
349 Offender Registration and Notification Act,
350 Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and
351 Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248; or
352 (5) Any offender who is adjudicated in
353 Missouri for any offense of a sexual nature
354 requiring registration under sections 589.400 to
355 589.425 that is not classified as a tier I or
356 tier II offense in this section.
357 8. In addition to the requirements of
358 subsections 1 to 7 of this section, all Missouri
359 registrants who work, including as a volunteer
360 or unpaid intern, or attend any school whether
361 public or private, including any secondary
362 school, trade school, professional school, or
363 institution of higher education, on a full-time

HCS SB 982 82
364 or part-time basis or have a temporary residence
365 in this state shall be required to report in
366 person to the chief law enforcement officer in
367 the area of the state where they work, including
368 as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend any
369 school or training and register in that state.
370 "Part-time" in this subsection means for more
371 than seven days in any twelve-month period.
372 9. If a person who is required to register
373 as a sexual offender under sections 589.400 to
374 589.425 changes or obtains a new online
375 identifier as defined in section 43.651, the
376 person shall report such information in the same
377 manner as a change of residence before using
378 such online identifier.]
589.415. [1.] Any probation officer or parole officer
assigned to a sexual offender who is required to register
pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall notify the
appropriate law enforcement officials whenever the probation
officer or parole officer has reason to believe that the
offender will be changing his or her residence. Upon
obtaining the new address where the offender expects to
reside, the probation officer or parole officer shall report
such address to the [chief law enforcement] registration
official with whom the offender last registered and the
[chief law enforcement] registration official of the county
having jurisdiction over the new residence, if different.
The probation officer or parole officer shall also inform
the offender of the offender's duty to register. However,
nothing in this section shall affect the offender's duty to
register, pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425.
[2. As used in this section, the term "probation
officer" includes any agent of a private entity assigned to
provide probation supervision services to an offender due to

HCS SB 982 83
the offender's status as a sexual offender who is required
to register pursuant to sections 589.400 to 589.425.]
589.417. 1. Except for the specific information
listed in subsection 2 of this section, the complete
statements, photographs and fingerprints required by
sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall not be subject to the
provisions of chapter 610 and are not public records as
defined in section 610.010, and shall be available only to
courts, prosecutors and law enforcement agencies.
2. [Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the chief law enforcement official of the county]
(1) The following information shall be available as an open
record under chapter 610:
(a) Any information retained by the Missouri state
highway patrol required to be published on the internet at
the time of the request, as provided in section 589.411; and
(b) The name, offense requiring registration, dates of
registration, and compliance status of any offender who has
been removed from the internet because of death or a move
out of the state. For offenders who have moved out of the
state, the new state of residence shall also be an open
record.
(2) The registration official shall maintain, for all
offenders registered in such county, a complete list of the
names, addresses and crimes for which such offenders are
registered. Any person may request such list from the
[chief law enforcement] registration official of the county.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to open
any records relating to an offender who has been removed
from the sexual offender registry or found exempt under
section 589.401. Such records shall be governed by the
provisions of chapter 610.

HCS SB 982 84
4. The metadata recorded by the sex offender registry
system, website, or other related databases utilized by the
sex offender registry including activity logs, user
information, or other related information shall be a closed
record, available only to authorized users for the
administration of criminal justice, as the term
"administration of criminal justice" is defined in section
43.500.
632.489. 1. Upon filing a petition pursuant to
section 632.484 or 632.486, the judge shall determine
whether probable cause exists to believe that the person
named in the petition is a sexually violent predator. If
such probable cause determination is made, the judge shall
direct that person be taken into custody and direct that the
person be transferred to an appropriate secure facility,
including, but not limited to, a county jail. If the person
is ordered to the department of mental health, the director
of the department of mental health shall determine the
appropriate secure facility to house the person under the
provisions of section 632.495.
2. Within seventy-two hours after a person is taken
into custody pursuant to subsection 1 of this section,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, such person
shall be provided with notice of, and an opportunity to
appear in person at, a hearing to contest probable cause as
to whether the detained person is a sexually violent
predator. At this hearing the court shall:
(1) Verify the detainee's identity; and
(2) Determine whether probable cause exists to believe
that the person is a sexually violent predator. The state
may rely upon the petition and supplement the petition with
additional documentary evidence or live testimony.

HCS SB 982 85
3. At the probable cause hearing as provided in
subsection 2 of this section, the detained person shall have
the following rights in addition to the rights previously
specified:
(1) To be represented by counsel;
(2) To present evidence on such person's behalf;
(3) To cross-examine witnesses who testify against
such person; and
(4) To view and copy all petitions and reports in the
court file, including the assessment of the
multidisciplinary team.
4. If the probable cause determination is made, the
court shall direct that the person be transferred to an
appropriate secure facility, including, but not limited to,
a county jail, for an evaluation as to whether the person is
a sexually violent predator. If the person is ordered to
the department of mental health, the director of the
department of mental health shall determine the appropriate
secure facility, which may include the department of
corrections or a county jail as set forth in section
632.495, to house the person. The court shall direct the
director of the department of mental health to have the
person examined by a psychiatrist or psychologist as defined
in section 632.005 who was not a member of the
multidisciplinary team that previously reviewed the person's
records. In addition, such person may be examined by a
consenting psychiatrist or psychologist of the person's
choice at the person's own expense. Any examination shall
be conducted in the facility in which the person is
confined. Any examinations ordered shall be made at such
time and under such conditions as the court deems proper;
except that, if the order directs the director of the

HCS SB 982 86
department of mental health to have the person examined, the
director shall determine the time, place and conditions
under which the examination shall be conducted. The
psychiatrist or psychologist conducting such an examination
shall be authorized to interview family and associates of
the person being examined, as well as victims and witnesses
of the person's offense or offenses, for use in the
examination unless the court for good cause orders
otherwise. The psychiatrist or psychologist shall have
access to all materials provided to and considered by the
multidisciplinary team and to any police reports related to
sexual offenses committed by the person being examined. Any
examination performed pursuant to this section shall be
completed and filed with the court within sixty days of the
date the order is received by the director or other
evaluator unless the court for good cause orders otherwise.
One examination shall be provided at no charge by the
department. All costs of any subsequent evaluations shall
be assessed to the party requesting the evaluation.
632.492. Within sixty days after the completion of any
examination held pursuant to section 632.489, the court
shall conduct a trial to determine whether the person is a
sexually violent predator. The trial may be continued upon
the request of either party and a showing of good cause, or
by the court on its own motion in the due administration of
justice, and when the respondent will not be substantially
prejudiced. At all stages of the proceedings pursuant to
sections 632.480 to 632.513, any person subject to sections
632.480 to 632.513 shall be entitled to the assistance of
counsel, and if the person is indigent, the court shall
appoint counsel to assist such person. The person, the
attorney general, or the judge shall have the right to

HCS SB 982 87
demand that the trial be before a jury. If the trial is
held before a jury, the judge shall instruct the jury that
if it finds that the person is a sexually violent predator,
the person shall be committed to the custody of the director
of the department of mental health to be housed in an
appropriate secure facility, as determined by the director
of the department of mental health as set forth in section
632.495, for control, care and treatment. If no demand for
a jury is made, the trial shall be before the court. The
court shall conduct all trials pursuant to this section in
open court, except as otherwise provided for by the child
victim witness protection law pursuant to sections 491.675
to 491.705.
632.495. 1. The court or jury shall determine
whether, by clear and convincing evidence, the person is a
sexually violent predator. If such determination that the
person is a sexually violent predator is made by a jury,
such determination shall be by unanimous verdict of such
jury. Any determination as to whether a person is a
sexually violent predator may be appealed.
2. If the court or jury determines that the person is
a sexually violent predator, the person shall be committed
to the custody of the director of the department of mental
health for control, care and treatment until such time as
the person's mental abnormality has so changed that the
person is safe to be at large. Such control, care and
treatment shall be provided or arranged by the department of
mental health in an appropriate secure facility, as
determined by the director of the department of mental
health as set forth in this section.
3. At all times, persons ordered to the department of
mental health after a determination by the court that such

HCS SB 982 88
persons may meet the definition of a sexually violent
predator, persons ordered to the department of mental health
after a finding of probable cause under section 632.489, and
persons committed for control, care and treatment by the
department of mental health pursuant to sections 632.480 to
632.513 shall be kept in a secure facility designated by the
director of the department of mental health and such persons
shall be segregated at all times from any other patient
under the supervision of the director of the department of
mental health. The department of mental health shall not
place or house a person ordered to the department of mental
health after a determination by the court that such person
may meet the definition of a sexually violent predator, a
person ordered to the department of mental health after a
finding of probable cause under section 632.489, or a person
committed for control, care, and treatment by the department
of mental health, pursuant to sections 632.480 to 632.513,
with other mental health patients. The provisions of this
subsection shall not apply to a person who has been
conditionally released under section 632.505.
4. The department of mental health is authorized to
enter into an interagency agreement with the department of
corrections for the confinement of [such] persons ordered to
the department of mental health after a determination by the
court that such persons may meet the definition of a
sexually violent predator or for the confinement of persons
ordered to the department of mental health after a finding
of probable cause under section 632.489, provided the
department of corrections has necessary space and services
available and the director of the department of corrections
has agreed to provide such confinement through an
interagency agreement with the department of mental health.

HCS SB 982 89
Such persons who are in the confinement of the department of
corrections pursuant to an interagency agreement shall be
housed and managed separately from offenders in the custody
of the department of corrections, and except for occasional
instances of supervised incidental contact, shall be
segregated from such offenders. If the department of mental
health and the department of corrections have entered into
an interagency agreement as provided in this subsection, the
department of corrections is authorized to enter into one or
more contract agreements as may be necessary to perform the
agreed upon responsibilities of the department of
corrections under the interagency agreement including, but
not limited to, a contract agreement with one or more
licensed professionals or providers of health care services
to provide health care services to the persons identified in
this subsection.
5. The department of mental health is authorized to
enter into a contract agreement with one or more county
jails in Missouri for the confinement of persons ordered to
the department of mental health after a determination by the
court that such persons may meet the definition of a
sexually violent predator or for the confinement of persons
ordered to the department of mental health after a finding
of probable cause under section 632.489. Such persons who
are in the confinement of a county jail pursuant to a
contract agreement shall be housed and managed separately
from offenders in the custody of the county jail, and except
for occasional instances of supervised incidental contact,
shall be segregated from such offenders.
6. The department of mental health is authorized to
enter into an interagency agreement with the department of
corrections for the control and care, including health care

HCS SB 982 90
services, of persons committed to the department of mental
health by the court as a sexually violent predator, provided
the department of corrections has necessary space and
services available and the director of the department of
corrections has agreed to provide such control and care
through an interagency agreement with the department of
mental health. Such persons who are in the control and care
of the department of corrections under an interagency
agreement shall be housed and managed separately from
offenders in the custody of the department of corrections,
and except for occasional instances of supervised incidental
contact, shall be segregated from such offenders. If the
department of mental health and the department of
corrections have entered into an interagency agreement as
provided in this subsection, the department of corrections
is authorized to enter into one or more contract agreements
100 as may be necessary to perform the agreed upon
101 responsibilities of the department of corrections under the
102 interagency agreement including, but not limited to, a
103 contract agreement with one or more licensed professionals
104 or providers of health care services to provide health care
105 services to the persons identified in this subsection.
106 7. The department of mental health is authorized to
107 enter into a contract agreement with one or more licensed
108 professionals or providers of health care or mental health
109 care services to provide health care or mental health care
110 services to persons ordered to the department of mental
111 health after a determination by the court that such persons
112 may meet the definition of a sexually violent predator,
113 persons ordered to the department of mental health after a
114 finding of probable cause under section 632.489, and persons

HCS SB 982 91
115 committed for control, care, and treatment by the department
116 of mental health under sections 632.480 to 632.513.
117 8. If the court or jury is not satisfied by clear and
118 convincing evidence that the person is a sexually violent
119 predator, the court shall direct the person's release.
120 [7.] 9. Upon a mistrial, the court shall direct that
121 the person be held at an appropriate secure facility,
122 including, but not limited to, a county jail, until another
123 trial is conducted. If the person is ordered to the
124 department of mental health, the director of the department
125 of mental health shall determine the appropriate secure
126 facility to house the person. Any subsequent trial
127 following a mistrial shall be held within ninety days of the
128 previous trial, unless such subsequent trial is continued as
129 provided in section 632.492.
632.504. Nothing in sections 632.480 to 632.513 shall
prohibit a person from filing a petition for release
pursuant to sections 632.480 to 632.513. However, if a
person has previously filed a petition for release without
the [director's] director of the department of mental
health's approval and the court determined either upon
review of the petition or following a hearing that the
petitioner's petition was frivolous or that the petitioner's
condition had not so changed that the person was safe to be
at large, then the court shall deny the subsequent petition
unless the petition contains facts upon which a court could
find the condition of the petitioner had so changed that a
hearing was warranted. Upon receipt of a first or
subsequent petition from committed persons without the
director's approval, the court shall endeavor whenever
possible to review the petition and determine if the

HCS SB 982 92
petition is based upon frivolous grounds and if so shall
deny the petition without a hearing.
632.520. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Employee of the department of mental health", a
person who is an employee of the department of mental
health, an employee or contracted employee of a
subcontractor of the department of mental health, or an
employee or contracted employee of a subcontractor of an
entity [responsible for confining offenders] under an
interagency agreement or contract with the department of
mental health as authorized by section 632.495;
(2) "Offender", a person ordered to the department of
mental health after a determination by the court that the
person meets the definition of a sexually violent predator,
a person ordered to the department of mental health after a
finding of probable cause under section 632.489, or a person
committed for control, care, and treatment by the department
of mental health under sections 632.480 to 632.513;
(3) "Secure facility", a facility operated by the
department of mental health or an entity [responsible for
confining offenders] designated by the department of mental
health to confine offenders or provide control and care to
offenders as authorized by section 632.495.
2. No offender shall knowingly commit violence to an
employee of the department of mental health or to another
offender housed in a secure facility. Violation of this
subsection shall be a class B felony.
3. No offender shall knowingly damage any building or
other property owned or operated by the department of mental
health. Violation of this subsection shall be a class D
felony.

HCS SB 982 93
[589.402. 1. The chief law enforcement
officer of the county or city not within a
county may maintain a web page on the internet,
which shall be open to the public and shall
include a registered sexual offender search
capability.
2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and
5 of this section, the registered sexual
offender search shall make it possible for any
person using the internet to search for and find
the information specified in subsection 3 of
this section, if known, on offenders registered
in this state pursuant to sections 589.400 to
589.425.
3. Only the information listed in this
subsection shall be provided to the public in
the registered sexual offender search:
(1) The name and any known aliases of the
offender;
(2) The date of birth and any known alias
dates of birth of the offender;
(3) A physical description of the offender;
(4) The residence, temporary, work, and
school addresses of the offender, including the
street address, city, county, state, and zip
code;
(5) Any photographs of the offender;
(6) A physical description of the
offender's vehicles, including the year, make,
model, color, and license plate number;
(7) The nature and dates of all offenses
qualifying the offender to register, including
the tier level assigned to the offender under
sections 589.400 to 589.425;
(8) The date on which the offender was
released from the department of mental health,
prison, or jail, or placed on parole, supervised
release, or probation for the offenses
qualifying the offender to register;
(9) Compliance status of the offender with
the provisions of sections 589.400 to 589.425;
and
(10) Any online identifiers, as defined in
section 43.651, used by the person. Such online

HCS SB 982 94
identifiers shall not be included in the general
profile of an offender on the web page and shall
only be available to a member of the public by a
search using the specific online identifier to
determine if a match exists with a registered
offender.
4. The chief law enforcement officer of
any county or city not within a county may
publish in any newspaper distributed in the
county or city not within a county the sexual
offender information provided under subsection 3
of this section for any offender residing in the
county or city not within a county.
5. Juveniles required to register under
subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of section
589.400 shall be exempt from public notification
to include any adjudications from another state,
territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign
country or any federal, tribal, or military
jurisdiction.]
✓